Feds seek to lock press, public out of Portland bomb trial | <paragraph>  Federal prosecutors have moved to lock the press and public out of testimony by undercover FBI personnel at the upcoming trial of an Oregon man accused of plotting to bomb a Christmas tree lighting ceremony in Portland in 2010.  <paragraph>  In order to keep the identities of the undercover agents secret, prosecutors want to close the courtroom at Mohamed Mohamud’s trial while the agents testify. The press and public could sit in another courtroom and watch a partially-obscured video feed in which the “images” of the undercover FBI employees would not be visible.  <paragraph>  Prosecutors also want to alter the appearance of their key witnesses—a little bit, anyway.  <paragraph>  “The [undercover employees] may testify using a light disguise, such as changing the UCEs’ facial hair, hairstyle, or dress style,” prosecutors wrote in an Oct. 23 motion (posted   <hyperlink> here). “When the UCEs testify, only the Court, essential personnel, the jury, the defendant and his counsel, and the government’s trial team shall be present in the courtroom.”  <paragraph>  Mohamud’s lawyers have objected to the secrecy.  <paragraph>  “The measures sought by the government would convey information or impressions to the jury that undermine the presumption of innocence and the right to a fair trial based solely on the evidence," defense attorneys Steve Sady and Steve Wax wrote in their response (posted   <hyperlink> here). "Such restrictions have also historically been disfavored as unfairly prejudicial to the defense, because jurors who witness such precautions are likely to assume that the defendant is especially dangerous and thus guilty."  <paragraph>  “Any disguise that would actually conceal the operatives’ identities would almost certainly obscure their facial expressions. Assessing facial expression is critical to a fact finder’s assessment of a witness’s credibility, and even to counsel’s fine-tuning of the examination of that witness,” the defense added.  <paragraph>  The defense lawyers also noted that, regardless of whether the court authorizes any special measures to protect the FBI employees, their client could easily recognize them. “Mr. Mohamud himself, of course, has long been in a position to identify the operatives by sight, as he spent hours on end in their presence and following their directions,” the defense attorneys added.  <paragraph>  Prosecutors are also seeking to keep the true names of the operatives from the defense on the grounds that their identities are classified. The operatives are involved in ongoing undercover investigations, the government says.  <paragraph>  The Sixth Amendment to the U.S. Constitution guarantees defendants a public trial. Courts have also interpreted the First Amendment to require that criminal proceedings be open to the public. However, partial closures of trials have been upheld in unusual or exceptional circumstances.  <paragraph>  The secrecy measures the government is seeking are unusual, but have been employed in several federal criminal trials in recent years. Similar measures were used to obscure the identities of Israeli government security personnel who testified against Palestinian activists at terror-finance related trials in Tampa, Chicago and Dallas. Just last month, the Supreme Court declined to take up an appeal stemming from the Dallas trial, which involved leaders of the Holy Land Foundation charity.  <paragraph>  While measures such as trial closures, disguises and the like have been used only rarely in American courtrooms up to this point, the rationale supporting them would appear to apply in numerous cases, since undercover informants are frequently used in drug, gang and organized crime prosecutions.  <paragraph>  U.S. District Court Judge Garr King has yet to rule on the motion. The trial for Mohamud, a naturalized U.S. citizen from Somalia, is set to get underway Jan. 15.
Foreign Policy mag fights suit by Abbas's son |  <paragraph>  Foreign Policy magazine is asking a federal court to toss out   <hyperlink> a libel suit filed by Yasser Abbas, a son of Palestinian Authority President Mahmoud Abbas, over   <hyperlink> a commentary the international affairs journal published in June suggesting that Yasser Abbas has grown wealthy due to his father’s political position. <paragraph>  In legal papers filed this month in U.S. District Court, Foreign Policy—a division of the Washington Post Co.—argues that Abbas’s lawsuit is part of a pattern of litigation aimed at intimidating his critics.  <paragraph>  Foreign Policy’s attorneys also argue that the lawsuit should be dismissed in accordance with a District of Columbia law passed in 2010 and aimed at ensuring robust debate on issues of public significance.  <paragraph>  “While Abbas’s legal strategy might sometimes be effective in places in the world with lesser protection for freedom of speech and the press than in the United States, it certainly cannot pass muster under the First Amendment – let alone in the District of Columbia, which has enacted legislation to address this precise scenario, which involves a classic Strategic Lawsuit Against Public Participation,” lawyers Kevin Baine of Williams and Connolly and Nathan Siegel of Levine Sullivan Koch & Schulz wrote in the Nov. 5 motion to dismiss (posted   <hyperlink> here).  <paragraph>  So-called anti-SLAPP laws allow for the expedited dismissal of defamation suits when a plaintiff does not have evidence at the outset of a case that he or she is likely to prevail. They’ve been passed in numerous states and jurisdictions to crack down on the practice of companies and individuals filing lawsuits that can drain a target financially even if the suits have little chance of ultimate success on the merits.  <paragraph>  It’s not entirely clear that the D.C. anti-SLAPP law applies in federal court, but the magazine’s lawyers say the weight of legal precedent suggests that it does.  <paragraph>  Foreign Policy also filed a separate motion arguing that Abbas’s suit should be dismissed because the commentary, written by Jonathan Schanzer of the Foundation for Defense of Democracies was largely a question-raising exercise that did not make factual assertions, was essentially opinion protected by the First Amendment, and generally didn’t meet the definition of libelous material.  <paragraph>  The case is pending before Judge Emmet Sullivan, who has not yet ruled on the motions. (Yasser Abbas's complaint against Foreign Policy, the Post company and Schanzer, was filed in September and is available   <hyperlink> here courtesy of Courthouse News.)  <paragraph>  The Abbas lawsuit evokes a libel case filed against the Washington Post itself three decades ago by William Tavoulareas, the head of Mobil Oil, and his son Peter, over a 1979 news article arguing that Peter had won shipping business from Mobil as a result of his father's position. That case went to trial and resulted in a $2 million verdict against the Post. However, the judge who presided over the trial granted a post-trial motion tossing out the verdict and the suit.  <paragraph>  In 1987—some eight years after the article indispute was published, the D.C. Circuit sitting en banc,  <hyperlink> upheld the decision to toss out the verdict. <paragraph>  Baine, one of the lawyers defending Foreign Policy in the Abbas suit, was part of the team that defended the Washington Post in the marathon Tavoulareas litigation.  <paragraph>  Disclosure: One of the firms representing Foreign Policy, Levine Sullivan, also does legal work for POLITICO .
U of Denver removes, restores Paula Broadwell video | <paragraph>  <video>  <paragraph>  <video> <paragraph>  The University of Denver removed a speech by alleged David Petraeus paramour Paula Broadwell from YouTube earlier Monday but later re-posted it, a spokeswoman for the school confirmed.  <paragraph>  "We did remove it for a few hours this morning while we were conducting an internal review.  Sorry, again for the inconvenience," spokeswoman Kim DeVigil wrote in response to a query from POLITICO. Despite our inquirites, she did not elaborate on who initiated the review or why.  <paragraph>  Despite the re-posting the video on the university's official YouTube account, a number of blog posts relating to it continue to show that "this video has been removed by the user." That's because the video was re-posted with a different link. <paragraph>  Some recent press reports suggested Broadwell may have shared sensitive or classified information in her Oct. 26 remarks at a D.U. alumni event. However, most or all of what she said about the attack on the U.S. consulate in Benghazi, Libya was reported earlier that day by Fox News, as we noted   <hyperlink> here.
Broadwell spoke of access to classified info |   <paragraph>  <video>  <paragraph>  Paula Broadwell, the author, military reservist and West Point graduate who reportedly had an extramarital affair with former CIA director David Petraeus, told an audience this summer that she routinely had access to classified information while researching a book on Petraeus's work as the commanding general in Afghanistan.  <paragraph>  During a panel discussion, Broadwell said her background  in the military and her continuing obligations as a major in the Army Reserve made her particularly careful not to disclose sensitive information she was privy to while an "embed" in Afghanistan in 2010 and 2011.  <paragraph>  "I was entrusted with this opportunity to sit in on high level meetings with General Petraeus. Sitting in on SCIF [sensitive compartmented information facility] meetings in the morning, listen to classified chatter of terrorist talk and so forth. And I had that background anyhow, so I knew a lot of that information for my writing, but I knew there was a clear line that I couldn’t cross when I was writing it out," Broadwell said in   <hyperlink> the July 2012 discussion at the Aspen Security Forum in Colorado.  <paragraph>  (  <hyperlink> Also on POLITICO: Paula Broadwell in media spotlight)  <paragraph>  Broadwell acknowledged that her connection to the military and her role as a writer sometimes caused confusion among military personnel she encountered while working on the book.  <paragraph>  "I was embedded with Gen. Petraeus in Afghanistan and it was a little confusing for some of the folks there because I’m also a military reservist with a top secret/SCI clearance and then some. So, a lot of my former peers didn’t know how to treat me. Was I journalist Broadwell or was I Major Broadwell?" she recalled. "I had to follow very clear lines of non-disclosure and signed non-disclosure agreements like my colleagues. I felt like I was almost held to a higher level of accountability because I could lose my clearance."  <paragraph>  Broadwell's access to classified information has drawn scrutiny in the wake of reports that investigators found classified records on her computer and that a whistleblower approached House Majority Leader Eric Cantor (R-Va.) recently to express concern that a relationship Petraeus had may have led to classified information being compromised. The discovery of the classified information on Broadwell's computer was   <hyperlink> reported by the Wall Street Journal on Sunday. The involvement of Cantor, whose staff said the information was immediately passed on to the FBI, was   <hyperlink> disclosed Saturday by the New York Times.  <paragraph>  Other news reports have also raised questions about Broadwell's access to classified information, including details related to the attack on the U.S. consulate in Benghazi, Libya in September.  <paragraph>  (  <hyperlink> Also on POLITICO: Critics question Petraeus's timing)  <paragraph>  In a speech last month at the University of Denver, Broadwell said that the CIA at one point was holding prisoners at an annex near the consulate, and that the assault may have been an effort to free those prisoners. "I don't know if a lot of you heard this, but the CIA annex had actually—had taken a couple of Libyan militia members prisoner and they think that the attack on the consulate was an effort to try to get these prisoners back. So, that's still being vetted," she said, according to a video of the Denver event posted online and first   <hyperlink> reported by the Israeli media outlet Arutz Sheva.  <paragraph>  Later in her remarks, Broadwell, said some of her information had come from a Fox News report.  <hyperlink> Fox said Monday that it's "original" Oct. 26 report did mention three Libyan militia members being turned over by the CIA to Libyan authorities. That detail   <hyperlink> does not appear in the version of the story now posted online, but Fox reporter Jennifer Griffin did include it in at least one report.  <paragraph>  "We're also told, those at the CIA annex took into custody three Libyan attackers and were forced to hand them over to the Libyan February 17th forces that came to help at the annex approximately 4:00 in the morning. They handed these three Libyans over. It is not clear from U.S. officials what happened to the libyans and whether those Libyan attackers were in fact released in in the end by the Libyans," Griffin reported.  <paragraph>  The CIA has denied holding any prisoners at Benghazi and has vigorously disputed other aspects of Griffin's report, but it's not clear Broadwell said anything in Denver that was not previously reported by Fox. (Griffin first issued her report at about 11 A.M. Eastern Time that day. Broadwell, per  <hyperlink> a D.U. schedule, spoke after 7 P.M. Mountain Time.)  <paragraph>  At the Aspen conference in July, panel moderator Clark Bell of the McCormick Foundation said "certain elements" of Broadwell's book, "All In: The Education of David Petraeus," underwent a pre-publication security review to scrub it of classified information.  <paragraph>  Journalists embedded with the military often have access to some classified information. The practice falls into a kind of gray area. Many embed assignments would be hard to undertake without knowing some sensitive information about tactics and upcoming operations. But, journalists don't have security clearances and are not subject to background investigations.  <paragraph>  (  <hyperlink> Also on POLITICO: 10 fast facts about Gen. Petraeus)  <paragraph>  In any event, Broadwell said she did not consider herself a journalist. In her remarks to the security professionals, journalists and government contractors at the Aspen event, she repeatedly used language that stressed how familiar she was with secret matters. During her relatively brief comments, she spoke of working for a Joint Terrorism Task Force, of her top secret clearance "and then some," and of familiarity with "Five Eyes" efforts—lingo for U.S. Government intelligence information shared only with Australia, New Zealand, Canada and the United Kingdom.  <paragraph>  While Broadwell stressed the access she had, she also said she was especially vigilant to not disclose any classified information because it would have been a breach of trust between her and Petraeus, whom she described as a mentor. <paragraph>  "Sometimes, obviously, the government just cant disclose sources and methods and so forth," she said. "That was just reinforced when I had access to everything, it was my responsibility not to leak it—not to violate my mentor, if you will. I was writing about a very close mentor."  <paragraph>  UPDATE (Monday, 1:45 P.M.): An earlier version of this post said Fox News did not appear to have reported that prisoners were taken by the CIA in Benghazi. Fox says it did report something similar to that on Oct. 26.  <paragraph>  UPDATE (Monday, 2:02 P.M.) We've located the original Fox quote and posted it above.
Manning offers guilty pleas in WikiLeaks case |  <paragraph>  Army Private Bradley Manning is offering to plead guilty to some charges in the court martial he is facing for allegedly providing thousands of diplomatic cables, military reports and videos to WikiLeaks.  <paragraph>  Manning made the offer through his attorney, David Coombs, at a preliminary hearing Wednesday at Fort Meade, Md.  Manning faces a total of 34 charges, including aiding the enemy, violating the Espionage Act by providing classified information to an unauthorized party, and violating Army regulations and orders.  <paragraph>  Coombs said in   <hyperlink> a blog post Wednesday night that Manning is willing to admit that the facts support some of the charges, including in some cases lesser offenses incorporated in more serious charges brought against the Army intelligence analyst. However, there is no plea deal or agreement with the government at this time.  <paragraph>  Experts said Manning's move may be an attempt to reinforce the defense's arguments that the case is "overcharged," meaning the charges are more serious than befits what the soldier actually did or is alleged to have done. However, if prosecutors want to proceed with the full case as charged, there is nothing about Manning's offer that forces them not to.  <paragraph>  "PFC Manning has offered to plead guilty to various offenses through a process known as 'pleading by exceptions and substitutions.' To clarify, PFC Manning is not pleading guilty to the specifications as charged by the Government," Coombs wrote. "Rather, PFC Manning is attempting to accept responsibility for offenses that are encapsulated within, or are a subset of, the charged offenses.  The Court will consider whether this is a permissible plea."  <paragraph>  Manning has also elected not to be tried by a panel of military officers, but by a military judge sitting alone.  <paragraph>  On the scene reports from Wednesday's hearing are available from   <hyperlink> Kevin Gosztola at Firedoglake,  <hyperlink> Adam Klasfeld of Courthouse News and   <hyperlink> blogger/ad hoc transcriptionist Alexa O'Brien.
Cuomo: Storm victims can vote anywhere in New York |  <paragraph>  Gov. Andrew Cuomo (D-N.Y.) announced Monday that New York residents displaced by Hurricane Sandy can cast ballots anywhere in the state.  <paragraph>  "We want everyone to vote. Just because people are displaced doesn't mean they should be disenfranchised," Cuomo said at a news conference, according to the Asssociated Press.  <paragraph>    <hyperlink> On Twitter, Cuomo indicated that permission to vote "by affidavit" had been granted to residents of Rockland and Westchester counties, Long Island and New York City.  <paragraph>  Civil rights and voting rights groups had urged Cuomo to issue such an order, much as N.J. Gov. Chris Christie's administration did on Saturday.  <paragraph>  Cuomo said all voters will be able to cast ballots for president and U.S. Senate, but only those voters who go to a precinct in their home district will be able to vote for state Senate, assembly and local offices.  <paragraph>  "You can't vote for what we call down-ballot individuals," Cuomo said. "Your vote will not be eligible."
Judge sets hearing in Ohio provisional-votes fight |  <paragraph>  A federal judge has set a hearing for Wednesday morning—the morning after Election Day—to hear arguments about the rules for counting provisional ballots in Ohio.  <paragraph>  U.S. District Court Judge Algenon Marbley set the 11 A.M. Wednesday session in Columbus via an order issued Monday afternoon and posted   <hyperlink> here.  <paragraph>  Ohio Secretary of State Jon Husted issued a directive Friday that requires voters to complete the identification section on provisional ballots, rather than pollworkers. A variety of unions, a homeless-aid group and the Ohio Democratic Party say having voters fill that out themselves could lead to inaccuracies or errors. The labor groups and Democrats have asked Marbley to order the state to count provisional ballots even if that identification information is incomplete.  <paragraph>  "Since this suit bears on Ohio’s conduct of the November 6, 2012 election, it is appropriate to deviate from the Local Rules in order to expedite the briefing schedule and timely resolve the question. The timing is particularly sensitive given the need for Defendant Husted and the State of Ohio to issue instructions to election officials in conformity with this Court’s decision prior to the counting of provisional ballots," Marbley wrote in Monday's order.  <paragraph>  Marbley gave Ohio authorities until the end of the day Tuesday to file any written opposition to the plaintiffs' demand.  <paragraph>  The judge appears to view the matter as not of such urgency as to require action before Election Day because the relief the plaintiffs' are seeking is not to change Husted's order to pollworkers regarding who fills out the ID information, but rather the question of which ballots will ultimately be counted.  <paragraph>  Under Ohio law, the provisional ballots cannot be officially tabulated before Nov. 17th.
Lawsuit filed over Florida early voting waits |  <paragraph>  The Florida Democratic Party filed a federal lawsuit early Sunday over the extended delays some south   <hyperlink> Florida voters faced during the last official day of early voting on Saturday, when some who turned out to vote waited as long as six hours to cast their ballots. (A copy of the complaint is posted   <hyperlink> here.)  <paragraph>  However, it's not clear what more can be done about the situation at this late date and the three counties the Democrats sued seem to be offering the only specific relief sought in the suit—allowing voters to vote in person at each county's central elections office through Tuesday. <paragraph>  Miami-Dade County election officials announced that they would allow in-person absentee voting on Sunday afternoon from 1 P.M. to 5 P.M. It's something of an end-run around the Florida legislature's effort to reduce early voting days to eight from a maximum of 14 previously. Democrats have complained about the changes, calling them a Republican effort to disenfranchise voters, especially attendees of black churches who had bussed parishoners to the polls on the Sunday before Election Day. Defenders of the changes said the 14 days of early voting were too costly and distracting for election organizers.  <paragraph>  However, the Miami-Dade office closed its doors around 2 P.M., saying the staff and equipment were overwhelmed by demand,  <hyperlink> the Miami Herald reported. The office reopened later in the afternoon, but the closure angered about 180 potential voters who were locked out, the newspaper said. The Herald later reported that the interruption was due in part to objections from Miami Mayor Carlos Gimenez, who said he'd not been consulted about the change.  <paragraph>  Florida has fairly liberal absentee ballot rules, allowing absentee ballots to be issued to anyone who says he or she can't make it to the polls on Election Day. So, in-person absentee voting is more or less the same as early voting. However, early voting in Florida usually takes place at numerous sites across a county, while in-person absentee is conducted at permanent election offices and sometimes satellite locations.  <paragraph>  "The Elections Department took on this effort to continue serving our voters on the final Sunday before Election Day. While state law does not permit Early Voting today, we do have the authority to provide and accept absentee ballots," Miami-Dade Deputy Supervisor of Elections Christina White told POLITICO via e-mail. Dade County submitted   <hyperlink> this response to the federal lawsuit, calling it moot with respect to their county.  <paragraph>  Palm Beach County Supervisor of Elections Susan Bucher told POLITICO Sunday afternoon that her office was also allowing in-person voting after experiencing huge demand for the early voting session Saturday.  <paragraph>  "I was here when we were letting our last voter in at 2:30 in the morning," Bucher said. "This morning at 7:30 A.M., we had people waiting so we decided to let them vote in-person, absenteee. We have discretion under Florida law. So we opened up at 9:30 A.M. There's a line wrapped around the building and we're letting them vote."  <paragraph>  Bucher said anyone who's in line at her office by 5 P.M. Sunday will be permitted to vote.  <paragraph>  Broward County was also allowing some in-person absentee voting Sunday, but voters who'd made appointments were being given priority,  <hyperlink> the Herald said.  <paragraph>  All three counties also plan to allow in-person absentee voting on Monday and Tuesday.  <paragraph>  "With unprecedented turnout in South Florida, it is still our hope that the court will extend the early voting hours so that every eligible voter has a chance to vote," Florida Democratic Party executive director Scott Arceneaux said in a statement.  <paragraph>  Voters in Orange County, which includes and surrounds Orlando, will also get another chance at early voting Sunday after a suspicious package closed a polling site in Winter Park, Fla. for several hours Saturday. A local judge ordered that polling place to be open again Sunday.  <paragraph>  UPDATE (Sunday, 4:00 P.M.): This post has been updated with comments from Bucher and with the Herald's reports of an interruption to voting at the Miami-Dade election headquarters.  <paragraph>  UPDATE 2 (Sunday, 10:17 P.M.): This post has been updated with the Herald's report on Gimenez's role in Sunday's events.
Obama appeals to set rules for Guantanamo lawyers |  <paragraph>  The Obama Administration filed a series of appeals Friday night, seeking to overturn a federal judge's order that blocked the military from unilaterally establishing rules for lawyers who represent prisoners at Guantanamo Bay.  <paragraph>  U.S. District Court Judge Royce Lamberth   <hyperlink> ruled in September that lawyers who helped detainees bring habeas corpus petitions seeking release from Gitmo could continue to visit and communicate with their clients under the rules judges set. Lamberth rejected the Obama Administration's effort to cast those rules aside once the habeas cases or military commission cases and any related appeals were complete.  <paragraph>  In a blistering opinion, Lamberth noted that all the prisoners had a continuing right of access to the courts and he said the administration's move amounted to "an illegitimate exercise of Executive power." The indictment was a politically pointed one in light of the harsh criticism candidate Barack Obama leveled at President George W. Bush's administration over his assertion of unfettered executive power to prosecute the global war on terror.  <paragraph>  An administration official told POLITICO early Saturday that Friday's filings were made in order to keep open the option of an appeal and that no final decision has been made about whether to see an appeal through. <paragraph>  "The government filed a notice of appeal...to preserve its options in this matter. The consideration of an appeal requires appropriate and thorough deliberation and that process is ongoing," the official said.  <paragraph>  Nevertheless, for now the dispute heads to the U.S. Court of Appeals for the D.C. Circuit.  <paragraph>  UPDATE (Saturday, 10:27 A.M.): This post has been updated with comment from an administration official.
Romney dusts off Jobs Council attack |  <paragraph>  GOP presidential candidate Mitt Romney went after President Barack Obama on Friday for long-term neglect of his jobs council, dusting off an attack Romney mounted aggressively in July but later largely dropped from his campaign rhetoric.  <paragraph>  Obama "put together a jobs council. These were people he picked from industries around the country. He brought them in to give him advice as to how to create jobs. Do you know how long it’s been since he met with the jobs council? Nine months! Can you imagine that? Nine months!" Romney said during a stop at a mining equipment factory in Etna, Ohio. "Let me tell you: well, first of all, I like business and I’m going to have a lot of people offering advice but I know a good deal about it myself to begin with. And that’ll help being president.”  <paragraph>    <hyperlink> POLITICO reported in July that the President's Council on Jobs and Competitiveness had not held an official meeting in six months and had not met with Obama during that time. Following the report, both Romney and the Republican Party   <hyperlink> unleashed a fusillade of attacks on Obama, arguing that his apparent neglect of the panel was symbolic of his failure to craft policies to spur job creation.  <paragraph>  However, Romney hasn't said much, if anything, about the Jobs Council since. It was not mentioned in any of his three debates with Obama. The GOP candidate may have dialed back the criticism because some who served on the panel are Republicans or conservatives and an attack on Obama for not meeting with the panel is hard to distinguish with an attack on the panel itself for failing to meet. (One prominent Jobs Council member, Intel CEO Paul Otellini, endorsed Romney earlier this week.)  <paragraph>  A White House spokesman suggested in July that Obama had been too busy to meet with the panel in recent months, saying the president had "a lot on his plate." However, sources familiar with the council said an in-person meeting was likely being avoided because the business leaders on the panel felt awkward appearing with Obama in the midst of a presidential election. Rifts had also developed between the CEOs and the few labor leaders in the group.  <paragraph>  In   <hyperlink> a follow-up story in August, POLITICO noted that the council has held monthly, private telephone calls to discuss its recommendations with Obama Administration officials—a practice which disturbs transparency advocates. The last event of any kind   <hyperlink> noted on the Council's website was in June.  <paragraph>  White House officials say the panel's recommendations have been in large part adopted by the administration, though some require action by Congress. However, Romney is correct that the last official council meeting was more than nine months ago, on Jan. 17, 2012.  <paragraph>  The Obama campaign did not immediately respond to an e-mail seeking comment on Romney's renewed critique. —James Hohmann contributed to this post.
Judge unseals Liddy Watergate trial records | <paragraph>  A federal judge has ordered the release of long-sealed records relating to the 1973 trial of Watergate conspirators G. Gordon Liddy and James McCord, both of whom served as officials of President Richard Nixon's re-election bid.  <paragraph>  Chief Judge Royce Lamberth, acting on a petition from Texas A&M history professor Luke Nichter, issued an order Friday setting in motion the unsealing.  <paragraph>  Lamberth's order (posted   <hyperlink> here) unseals all records in the case apart from grand jury records, sentencing reports relating to living individuals, and "documents reflecting the contents of illegally obtained wiretaps." The Justice Department had agreed with unsealing of the Liddy case records, aside from those three categories.  <paragraph>  In an interview Friday, Nichter hailed the judge's decision. "The National Archives has told me they have an enormous quantity of Watergate records still sealed," the professor said. "They've told me they hope to bring these documents out of legal limbo, but you can't get them under [the Freedom of Information Act.] It takes extraordinary action by a judge to bring them out."  <paragraph>  Nichter said he believes at least some of the sealed records relate to Alfred Baldwin, a potential witness in the Libby case who was involved in wiretapping the Democratic National Committee's Watergate office that was broken into. Prosecutors sought to put Baldwin on the stand, but third-parties—apparently those overheard in the wiretaps—managed to block his testimony.  <paragraph>  Nichter said he sees little reason to keep the records sealed at this juncture. "A lot of folks involved in these events four decades ago are deceased. And, in light of later scandals, is it really necessary to keep all this secret?" he asked.  <paragraph>  Lamberth also gave the Justice Department 30 days to inventory all other sealed materials in the case and to explain why those records must remain sealed.So, more disclosures seem possible, even within the categories the Justice Department wants kept sealed.  <paragraph>  However, the judge rejected Nichter's request for a court-supervised investigation into what the professor termed breaches of grand jury secrecy by reporters for the Washington Post.  <paragraph>  Five other men were charged in the same case as Libby and McCord, but pled guilty before the trial. They included former CIA officer and White House aide E. Howard Hunt Jr. After the 16-day trial, a jury quickly convicted McCord and Liddy of conspiracy, burglary and electronic eavesdropping.  <paragraph>  Liddy was sentenced to 20-years in prison, but served a little over four years before he was paroled after receiving a commutation from President Jimmy Carter. McCord was sentenced to one to five years in that case and served about two months.
Lawsuit: Border checkpoint photo limits unconstitutional |  <paragraph>  A newly-filed lawsuit claims that a federal government policy limiting photography at border checkpoints and other points of entry to the United States violates the First Amendment.  <paragraph>  The suit was filed Wednesday in federal court in San Diego on behalf of two human rights activists who claim they were briefly detained and had their photos erased after taking pictures of border crossings in California. The four local ACLU affiliates along the U.S.-Mexico border filed the case along with  attorneys from the law firm of Morrison & Foerster.  <paragraph>  A policy of the Customs and Border Protection branch of the Department of Homeland Security prohibits photography of ports of entry without "prior approval" from a senior CBP official.  <paragraph>  "This CBP policy and/or practice continues to be an impermissible prior restraint on speech and to chill, deter, and infringe [plaintiffs'] First Amendment right to freedom of speech," according to the lawsuit (posted   <hyperlink> here). <paragraph>  Lawyers pressing the suit are attempting a kind of jujitsu against the Justice Department. The suit notes that in May the Justice Department issued a letter arguing that state laws limiting photography or recording of police are unconstitutional. "Recording governmental officers engaged in public duties is a form ofspeech through which private individuals may gather and disseminate information of public concern, including the conduct of law enforcement officers," the letter said.  <paragraph>  The issue of the right to photograph, and make audio and video recordings of police, has been a matter of contention in recent months in various parts of the country. A trend seems to be developing towards   <hyperlink> recognizing such activity as constitutionally-protected, though the local cases tend to revolve around traffic stops or arrests. <paragraph>  In response to a POLITICO query about the suit, a CBP spokesperson said Saturday: "U.S. Customs and Border Protection (CBP) cannot comment on ongoing litigation. CBP recognizes that travelers awaiting inspection at a port of entry will use electronic devices to communicate their status to family members, friends, or professional contacts. Due to security concerns, once a traveler begins the inspection process in the federal inspection station, CBP prohibits the use of these devices in order to ensure the safety of the CBP officer and the traveling public, and to protect against the unauthorized disclosure of information and the advancement of criminal activity.”  <paragraph>  However, the new lawsuit stresses that the plaintiffs, Ray Askins and Christian Ramirez, were not in the process of crossing the border when they ran into trouble with CBP. People actually crossing the border have been held to have fewer rights because of the need to search people and goods entering the U.S.  <paragraph>  Despite that distinction, if the suit is successful, it could also overturn the ban on use of cameras at customs and immigration facilities in U.S. airports. One powerful senator and avid photographer, Judiciary Committee Chairman Patrick Leahy, has   <hyperlink> insisted on the rights of the public to take photos at security checkpoints. Those checkpoints are controlled by another division of the Department of Homeland Security, the Transportation Security Administration.  <paragraph>  The new case has been assigned to U.S. District Court Judge Thomas Whelan, a Clinton appointee.  <paragraph>  UPDATE (Saturday, 4:56 P.M.): This post has been updated with a statement from Customs and Border Protection.
In pitches to troops, presidential candidates dodge and weave |  <paragraph>  In lobbying U.S. military personnel for their votes, GOP presidential candidate Mitt Romney sounds quite different than he did in the most recent debate, while President Barack Obama doesn't seem to want to square up with a key critique of his policy in Afghanistan.  <paragraph>  The Obama and Romney campaigns recently answered questions submitted in writing by Stars and Stripes about issues the independent, partially-federally-funded newspaper considered most of concern to soldiers, sailors, airmen and marines, as well as veterans.  <paragraph>  The   <hyperlink> Romney camp's answer to Stars and Stripes on Afghanistan is striking for its contrast with what the GOP hopeful said at the foreign policy debate on Monday and in a foreign policy speech earlier this month. In the statement released to the military audience, Romney branded Obama's decision to announce a withdrawal from Afghanistan in 2014 as "an enormous mistake."  <paragraph>  "Gov. Romney believes it was an enormous mistake to communicate a withdrawal to our enemies as it makes our transition mission more difficult," the statement sent to Stars and Stripes said. <paragraph>  If Romney believes that was an "enormous" error, it's odd he didn't mention it during the debate or during his speech at the Virginia Military Institute, where he alluded in vague terms to Obama decisions some people disagree with and warned against a politically-timed retreat, all while endorsing the 2014 timetable.  <paragraph>  In the debate, Romney seemed to drop his earlier talk of a 2014 withdrawal being dependent on conditions on the ground. "We'll make sure we bring our troops out by the end of 2014....We're going to be able to make that transition by the end of 2014. So our troops will come home at that point," Romney said, sounding as certain of an on-time withdrawal as Vice President Joe Biden did in his debate and more certain than Obama does, aside from this weekend off the reservation.  <paragraph>  The   <hyperlink> Obama camp's answers to Stars and Stripes also included their share of sophistry, dodging a key question about the public pull-out timetable: "Does the plan give enemy fighters an incentive to lie in wait until the U.S. leaves?" None of the sentences the Obama team provided responds directly to that point. There's also no direct response to whether the president is concerned that attacks on U.S. soldiers by Afghan personnel could so disrupt training that a successful transition could be jeopardized.
Judge speeds Fast and Furious contempt lawsuit |  <paragraph>  A House committee's lawsuit against Attorney General Eric Holder over his refusal to turn over some documents related to the fallout from Operation Fast and Furious will move forward at a faster pace than the parties requested, a federal judge ruled Wednesday.  <paragraph>  The Justice Department   <hyperlink> moved on Oct. 15 to throw out the lawsuit brought by the House Oversight and Government Reform Committee and agreed with the House panel that it's lawyers could have two months to respond to that motion. However, U.S. District Court Judge Amy Berman Jackson rejected that proposal on Wednesday, saying that the House committee should file its response by Nov. 16.  <paragraph>  "The Court is usually quite receptive to requests to extend the time limits imposed by the local rules, but the parties have not set forth grounds that would support the establishment of a schedule that is as expansive as this one. Moreover, the Court has determined that it is appropriate to resolve the pending motion to dismiss for lack of jurisdiction before establishing a schedule for the briefing and consideration of motions on the merits," Jackson wrote. <paragraph>  Jackson said the Justice Department could reply to the House panel by Dec. 10. She also set a status hearing for Nov. 27.  <paragraph>  The lawsuit tests the authority and the willingness of the courts to intercede in a dispute between Congress and the Executive Branch over access to documents Congress says it needs to carry out its oversight responsibilities. President Barack Obama exercised executive privilege to block disclosure of the records, which detail part of the Justice Department's response to Congress and the media in the wake of the controversy over Fast and Furious, a gunrunning investigation which may have allowed as many as 2000 weapons to flow from U.S. gun dealers to Mexican drug cartels.  <paragraph>  Despite Obama's invocation of executive privilege,  <hyperlink> the House voted in June to hold the attorney general in contempt of Congress and to authorize the filing of a lawsuit to compel production of the materials.
Family Research Council shooting suspect charged with terrorism |  <paragraph>  The man charged with shooting a security guard at the Washington office of the Family Research Council in August now faces a terrorism charge, federal officials announced Wednesday.  <paragraph>  Floyd Lee Corkins, II,  28, of Herndon, Va. was indicted Wednesday on ten charges, including violating District of Columbia law by committing an act of terrorism while armed. A Justice Department statement said it was the first time anyone has been charged under the District's 2002 anti-terrorism law, which defines terrorism as illegal acts undertaken to “intimidate or coerce a significant portion of the civilian population of the District of Columbia or the United States.” The offense carries a possible sentence of 30 years in prison.  <paragraph>  On Aug. 15, Corkins allegedly walked into the FRC's building at 801G Street NW, took a handgun out of a backpack and fired at an unarmed security guard, striking him in the arm. The guard subdued Corkins and was not critically injured, according to court filings.  <paragraph>  An FBI affidavit filed earlier in the case said that before opening fire Corkins said words to the effect of: "I don't like your politics." In addition, his parents indicated he "has strong opinions with respect to those he believes do not treat homosexuals in a fair manner." The Family Research Council is a prominent socially conservative organization that has opposed a variety of gay-rights measures, including same-sex marriage.  <paragraph>  Corkins's backpack contained 50 rounds of ammunition and fifteen Chick-fil-A sandwiches. The incident took place amidst publicity over Chick-fil-A executives' support for anti-same-sex marriage legislation.  <paragraph>  Corkins previously faced a federal firearms charge and two D.C. charges. Now, he faces a total of ten charges, including assault with intent to kill and attempted murder.  <paragraph>  CORRECTION: The initial version of this post indicate at one point that the victim of the shooting was killed in the attack. He was wounded but not killed.
Guilty plea in works over CIA leak | <paragraph>  Former Central Intelligence Agency officer John Kiriakou, who's accused of disclosing the identities of colleagues who interrogated suspected terrorists, may be on the verge of offering a guilty plea in the case.  <paragraph>  On Monday afternoon, an entry was added to the electronic docket of the federal court in Alexandria, Va. for a "change of plea" hearing at 11 A.M. Tuesday before U.S. District Court Judge Leonie Brinkema.  <paragraph>  Defense attorney Robert Trout declined to comment on the proposed plea, beyond confirming the docket entry. "That’s about all I’m going to say at this point," Trout said in a brief interview Monday afternoon.  <paragraph>  Kiriakou was indicted in April on three counts of violating the Espionage Act by disclosing classified information, one count of violating the Intelligence Identities Protection Act by exposing a covert officer, and one count of attempting to defraud the CIA's Publication Review Board.  <paragraph>  A source close to the case told POLITICO Monday that Kiriakou was offered a deal under which he'd plead guilty to one IIPA count and receive a sentence of two years, six months in custody. However, Kiriakou has been wavering about whether to accept it over the past week, said the source, who spoke on condition of anonymity.  <paragraph>  Last week,  <hyperlink> Brinkema canceled without explanation two important hearings scheduled in the case. Such an action often signals that a guilty plea is imminent. However, no guilty plea is final until accepted by a judge, who conducts an in-court exchange with the defendant to make sure he is certain about his wishes and fully informed of the consequences of the decision.  <paragraph>  Kiriakou's supporters say he's being persecuted because of the role he played in disclosing the CIA's use of controversial interrogation techniques like waterboarding. The Justice Department has denied any such retribution is behind the charges.
George McGovern, contrarian |  <paragraph>  While some of the obituaries published Sunday for the late Sen. George McGovern (D-S.D.) claim he was an unwavering, unabashed champion of the liberal left, he sometimes strayed from liberal orthodoxy, particularly after he left politics.  <paragraph>  In 1992, McGovern, who had purchased a small inn and restaurant in Connecticut, came out for tort reform.  <paragraph>  "Despite bankruptcy, we are still dealing with litigation from individuals who fell in or near our restaurant. Despite these injuries, not every misstep is the fault of someone else. Not every such incident should be viewed as a lawsuit instead of an unfortunate accident. And while the business owner may prevail in the end, the endless exposure to frivolous claims and high legal fees is frightening," McGovern wrote in a Wall Street Journal op-ed (non-paywalled text   <hyperlink> here.)  <paragraph>  And in 2008, McGovern denounced so-called card-check legislation pushed by large labor unions and endorsed by almost everyone in the Democratic Party establishment.  <paragraph>  "Workers in developing countries such as Mexico insist on the secret ballot when voting as to whether or not their workplaces should have a union," McGovern wrote, again on the Wall Street Journal's op-ed page (excerpts   <hyperlink> here). "We should have no less for employees in our country."  <paragraph>  That fall, McGovern went so far as to tape a 60-second TV ad for opponents of the labor-backed card check measure, known as the Employee Free Choice Act.  <paragraph>  "It's hard to believe that any politician would agree to a law denying millions of employees the right to a private vote," McGovern said in   <hyperlink> the TV spot. "This proposed law cannot be justified. Working families deserve a voice and a private vote. I'm Sen. George McGovern and I approved this message because democracy is something that should never be sacrificed."
Judge: Prisoners of U.S. in Afghanistan can't sue |  <paragraph>  Non-Afghan prisoners held by the U.S. military in Afghanistan cannot seek their freedom in U.S. courts, a federal judge reaffirmed in a ruling Friday.  <paragraph>  U.S. District Judge John Bates rejected arguments by lawyers for so-called third-country nationals that new circumstances and evidence about their detention at the Bagram Air Base near Kabul merited allowing them to pursue habeas corpus petitions in American courts.  <paragraph>  "Petitioners must resort to the argument that the transfer of some detainees to the Afghan government makes it less likely that other detainees will someday be transferred, even though the United States continues to reaffirm its goal of transferring custody of all detainees. But as a matter of logic, petitioners' argument makes little sense. Indeed, one could convincingly argue that the opposite is true," Bates wrote in his 24-page decision (posted   <hyperlink> here).  <paragraph>  In April 2009, Bates issued a landmark ruling that non-Afghan prisoners captured outside the country and taken to Bagram had the right to pursue habeas cases in U.S. courts. In May 2010, the U.S. Court of Appeals for the D.C. Circuit overturned his decision, but left open the door to further proceedings if circumstances changed.  <paragraph>  In his ruling Friday, Bates also labeled as "largely cumulative of evidence previously submitted" declarations from former government officials arguing that the foreign prisoners were likely moved to Afghanistan to evade judicial review.  <paragraph>  The Obama administration has fought hard against allowing prisoners at Bagram to pursue the same kind of habeas cases Guantanamo prisoners can, despite President Barack Obama's statements during the 2008 campaign decrying the Bush administration for using Guantanamo as a "legal black hole." The Obama administration has set up Detainee Review Boards in Afghanistan which the administration insists are more robust than the administrative procedures the Bush administration used for Guantanamo before the Supreme Court ruled that prisoners there have habeas rights. <paragraph>  Afghans held by the U.S. at Bagram also cannot sue in U.S. courts, but that issue has been less disputed because of legal precedent saying the courts should stay out of that issue, at least as long as U.S. forces are in combat in Afghanistan against the Taliban. Control of the Parwan detention facility at Bagram was partially transferred to the Afghan government in September, but both   <hyperlink> Afghan and third-country prisoners have remained under U.S. control.  <paragraph>  A deal to handover the prison that was key to Obama'a May visit to Afghanistan, but has since been thrown into doubt by a series of disagreements between the U.S. and Afghan authorities.
Parsing Obama on Guantanamo | <paragraph>  What exactly did President Barack Obama mean when he suggested Thursday that Congress needs to do more to establish a "legal architecture" to govern aspects of the war on terror?  <paragraph>  "One thing we have got to do is put a legal architecture in place and we need congressional help do that to make sure that not only am I reined in, but any president's reigned in, in terms of some of the decisions that we’re making," Obama told Jon Stewart on Comedy Central's "Daily Show."  <paragraph>  Obama made the comment just after he mentioned Guantanamo, so it seemed he may have been referring to some type of legislation to regulate the detention of war on terror prisoners. The remark echoed something the president said more than three years ago, in   <hyperlink> his only speech he devoted to the issue as president.  <paragraph>  "If and when we determine that the United States must hold individuals to keep them from carrying out an act of war, we will do so within a system that involves judicial and congressional oversight.  And so, going forward, my administration will work with Congress to develop an appropriate legal regime so that our efforts are consistent with our values and our Constitution," Obama said in May 2009.  <paragraph>  If that's what the president was talking about Thursday, it's a bit perplexing because the Obama administration  <hyperlink> decided later in 2009 not to pursue such legislation, even though   <hyperlink> officials determined that 48 of the men at Gitmo needed to be held indefinitely without trial.  <paragraph>  In August 2010,  <hyperlink> Sen. Lindsey Graham (R-S.C.) filed a bill that would have had Congress set some rules for the process of long-term detention of alleged terrorists. The administration, which had been   <hyperlink> negotiating intensely with Graham months earlier, didn't take a position on the measure, which essentially went nowhere.  <paragraph>  Last year, Congress passed a bill that appeared to give its general endorsement to the procedures the courts have worked out to review the detention of Guantanamo prisoners. Obama initially   <hyperlink> threatened to veto that measure, but   <hyperlink> relented after it was watered down. He also signed that and several other measures that effectively made it impossible for him to carry through on his plan to close Guantanamo.  <paragraph>  Throughout the discussions last year, administration officials signaled that they would have preferred Congress not dig into the issue. However, Obama may have been alluding to hopes some in the administration had early in their talks with Graham that a "grand bargain" might have been possible that would have combined closing Guantanamo with passing detention-related legislation. Those hopes were well dashed by last year and officials seemed uninterested in engaging on detailed detention-related legislation with Congress so stridently opposed to closing Guantanamo and bringing some of its prisoners to the U.S.  <paragraph>  It's conceivable Obama's comment to Stewart was about legislation to give a legal imprimatur to surveillance President George W. Bush untilaterally authorized. But that doesn't make a great deal of sense. Congress passed such legislation in 2008, while Obama was still a senator. Obama's Thursday comments were clearly directed at some kind of unfinished business with Congress.  <paragraph>  It's also possible the president was referring to legislation to regulate the process by which the U.S. authorizes the use of lethal force against individual terrorists abroad, particularly Americans. But the administration has insisted that the internal, secret process the White House, Defense Department and Central Intelligence Agency use to make those kinds of decisions is adequate to the task and has resisted efforts to involve the courts. In fact, Obama suggested later in the interview that a "legal structure and safeguards" were in place on that front. <paragraph>  The White House didn't immediately respond to a query late Thursday seeking more detail about what kind of "legal architecture" Obama wants Congress to put in place relating to terrorism.  <paragraph>  Here's an extended excerpt of the 'Daily Show" exchange: “Obama: There are some things that we haven't gotten done. I still want to close Guantanamo. We haven’t been able to get that through Congress. one thing we have got to do is put a legal architecture in place and we need congressional help do that to make sure that not only am I reined in but any president's reined in in terms of some of the decisions that we’re making. There are tough tradeoffs. Sometimes there's bad folks on the other side of the world and you have to make a call and it's not optimal but when you look at our track record what we've been able to do is to say we ended the war in Iraq, we're winding down the war in Afghanistan, we've gone after Al Qaeda and its leadership. it's true Al Qaeda's still active, at least sort of remnants of it, are staging in other parts of the Middle East and North Africa. Sometimes you have to make tough calls but you can do so in a way that's consistent with international and American law. Stewart: Within that as it ratchets down, i think people have been surprised to see the strength of the Bush-era warrantless wire-tapping laws and those types of things not also be lessened. The strictures that he put in place tthat people might have thought were government overreach and that maybe they had the mind you would perhaps tone down, you haven't. Obama: Well, the truth is we actually have modified them and built a legal structure and safeguards that are in place. That weren't there before on a whole range of issues Now, they're not real sexy issues... Stewart: You don’t know what I find sexy.”
Feds win round in CIA leak case |  <paragraph>  Prosecutors pursuing former CIA officer John Kiriakou for allegedly leaking the identities of two other CIA officers involved in interrogating terror suspects need not prove that Kiriakou intended to harm the United States or help a foreign nation, a federal judge ruled in an opinion made public Wednesday.  <paragraph>  The ruling from U.S. District Court Judge Leonie Brinkema is a defeat for Kiriakou's defense, which asked the judge to insist on the stronger level of proof — which most likely would have been very difficult for the government to muster. <paragraph>  In 2006, another federal judge in the same Northern Virginia courthouse, T.S. Ellis, imposed the higher requirement in a criminal case against two former lobbyists for the American Israel Public Affairs Committee.  <paragraph>  However, Brinkema said that situation was not parallel to that of Kiriakou, since he is accused of relaying information he learned as a CIA officer and the AIPAC staffers were not in the government at the time they were alleged to have received and passed on classified information.  <paragraph>  "Kiriakou was a government employee trained in the classification system who could appreciate the significance of the information he allegedly disclosed. Accordingly, there can be no question that Kiriakou was on clear notice of the illegality of his alleged communications. The facts thus clearly differentiate his case" from that of the ex-AIPAC officials, the judge wrote in her 13-page ruling (posted   <hyperlink> here).  <paragraph>  Brinkema also noted that a federal appeals court suggested the rule Ellis established in the AIPAC case, which was dropped in 2009 before trial, may have been erroneous. (One district court judge's ruling is not binding upon another, even in the same district.)  <paragraph>  The gist of Brinkema's ruling was indicated in footnotes to   <hyperlink> a defense filing made public last week and   <hyperlink> reported Monday by Secrecy News. However, the text of her ruling was not released until Wednesday.  <paragraph>  Brinkema's ruling focused on the Epsionage Act counts Kiriakou is facing for allegedly disclosing classified information. He is also charged with revealing the identity of a covert officer and with defrauding the CIA's Publications Review Board by giving it inaccurate information.  <paragraph>  On Tuesday, Brinkema abruptly postponed a major motions hearing in the case set for Wednesday and a hearing set for Thursday on journalists' motions to quash subpoenas from the defense. She gave no reason for canceling the hearings.  <paragraph>  The Washington Post's Julie Tate and freelancer Matt Cole are both fighting subpoenas served on them. A third subpoena, served on The New York Times's Scott Shane, was dropped, a New York Times spokeswoman confirmed Wednesday.  <paragraph>  UPDATE (Thursday, 12:32 A.M.): This post has been updated with information from the Times and to clarify a reference to the timing of events in the case.
Allen campaign, NRSC pulled DC radio buys | <paragraph>  George Allen's U.S. Senate campaign and the National Republican Senatorial Committee each recently canceled two weeks of radio ads across the D.C. metro area, according to documents obtained by POLITICO.  <paragraph>  Allen's campaign and the GOP committee said the cancellations were routine reallocations of advertising in the race to replace retiring Sen. Jim Webb (D-Va.)  <paragraph>  "We were going up on TV around that time and we bought radio outside" the D.C. area instead, Dan Allen of the George Allen campaign said Tuesday.  <paragraph>  "It’s common for both parties to adjust reservations in the final weeks and to shift money between TV and radio. But we have long viewed Virginia as one of our top takeover opportunities, and the millions of dollars we are spending in this race reflects that," the NRSC's Brian Walsh said.  <paragraph>  Records obtained by POLITICO show that on Sept. 19, Allen's media buyers notified radio stations in the D.C. area of a "marketwide" cancellation of ads set to run from Sept. 25 to Oct. 8.  <paragraph>  And on Sept. 27, the NRSC's media buyers told radio stations that it was backing out of reservations in the D.C. market for Oct. 10 to Oct. 23.  <paragraph>  A Republican source said the Democratic Senatorial Campaign Committee doesn’t currently have any radio ad time reserved in Virginia, but as of now the NRSC is still booked on the radio for the final three weeks of the campaign.  <paragraph>  However, Allen rival Tim Kaine's campaign has its own radio ad time booked from late August through November. The records reviewed by POLITICO did not show any Kaine cancellations of radio time on major D.C. stations during the period.
Court overturns conviction of bin Laden driver |  <paragraph>  A federal appeals court significantly narrowed the power of the military commissions at Guantanamo Bay by ruling Tuesday that those tribunals have no authority to try prisoners for providing assistance to terrorist organizations before 2006. <paragraph>  The ruling from a three-judge panel of the U.S. Court of Appeals for the D.C. Circuit overturned the military commission conviction of Salim Hamdan, a Yemeni man who served as a driver to Al Qaeda chief Osama bin Laden. Hamdan was transferred to Yemen in 2008 and released, but the court's ruling could affect other military commission cases. <paragraph>  The judges ruled that material support of terrorism, a common terrorism-related charge in U.S. civilian criminal courts, is not a war crime under international law and therefore is beyond the scope of what military commissions were permitted to do as originally constituted. <paragraph>  "When Hamdan committed the conduct in question, the international law of war proscribed a variety of war crimes, including forms of terrorism. At that time, however, the international law of war did not proscribe material support for terrorism as a war crime. Indeed, the Executive Branch acknowledges that the international law of war did not – and still does not – identify material support for terrorism as a war crime. Therefore, the relevant statute at the time of Hamdan’s conduct....did not proscribe material support for terrorism as a war crime," Judge Brett Kavanuagh wrote. (The opinion is posted   <hyperlink> here.)  <paragraph>  In a footnote, Kavanaugh noted that the ruling would not require Hamdan's release, since he could be detained under the law of war. (Presumably, this was a note about the opinion's application to others still at Guantanamo Bay.) The judge also noted that Hamdan could be charged for post-2006 material support in a military commission.  <paragraph>  There is little dispute that Hamdan could have been charged with material support in front of a civilian U.S. court, but such trials are oridnarily held only on U.S. soil and Congress has now essentially forbidden bringing current Guantanamo prisoners to the U.S. The court's ruling Tuesday leaves open the government's ability to use military commissions to charge individuals with established war crimes, such as intentional killing of non-combatants.  <paragraph>  Judges David Sentelle and Douglas Ginsburg joined in the vast majority of Kavanaugh's opinion. Ginsburg wrote a separate opinion saying that he would prefer to rule that the case was moot since Hamdan was returned to Yemen. However, Ginsburg agreed with the other judges that under current Supreme Court precedent, which lower courts are bound to follow, the case was not moot.  <paragraph>  Several other prisoners at Guantanamo have been convicted of material support, though the only one charged solely with that offense appears to be Australian David Hicks. He pled guilty in 2007 and was transferred to Australia, where he was released a few months later.  <paragraph>  Kavanaugh was appointed to the D.C. Circuit by President George W. Bush. Sentelle and Ginsburg are both appointees of President Ronald Reagan.  <paragraph>  Of course, they may not have the final word on the matter. The Justice Department could ask the full bench of the D.C. Circuit to hear the case or ask the Supreme Court to take it up.  <paragraph>  A Justice Department spokesman had no immediate comment.
DOJ: No role for courts in Fast and Furious contempt fight |  <paragraph>  The federal courts have no authority to intervene in the dispute that led to President Barack Obama asserting executive privilege for the first time in the context of a Congressional inquiry, the Justice Department argued in a legal brief filed Monday night.  <paragraph>  Soon after that assertion of privilege in June, the House voted to hold Attorney General Eric Holder in contempt of Congress for failing to turn over documents related to a House probe of the Fast and Furious gunrunning scandal.  <paragraph>  The Justice Department brief (posted   <hyperlink> here) argues that the executive branch's decision not to comply with such subpoenas or portions thereof cannot be second-guessed or rejected by the judiciary—a sweeping claim of executive power that aligns the Obama administration with the stance President George W. Bush's administration took in a similar dispute in 2008.  <paragraph>  "An assumption of jurisdiction here would short-circuit the constitutional design and threaten to alter permanently the relationship among the Branches," Justice Department lawyers contend in the 46-page brief, arguing that Congress has many other avenues open to it to try to force compliance with the subpoena. "Filing suit is far easier than mustering the votes necessary to cut appropriations, defeat legislation, or override a veto, and is far less visible to constituents. A decision allowing the case to proceed would thus greatly diminish the political costs of inter-Branch confrontation and reduce the incentive for Congress to evaluate and prioritize the demands of its myriad committees."  <paragraph>  The brief notes at length the extensive back-and-forth between the Justice Department and the House Oversight and Government Reform Committee over documents related to the panel's probe of Operation Fast and Furious, a Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives operation that reportedly allowed as many as 2000 firearms to flow from legal U.S. gun dealers to narcotraffickers in Mexico.  <paragraph>  One of the resolutions of contempt voted against Holder in June authorized the filing of a lawsuit to enforce the committee's subpoena. The panel   <hyperlink> filed such a suit in July in U.S. District Court in Washington.  <paragraph>  "This Court should not permit the Committee to circumvent this historical—and in this case, fruitful—process of negotiation and accommodation by seeking resolution of this inherently political dispute in federal court," the Justice Department argues in the new brief.  <paragraph>  The brief asserts that stepping into the Fast and Furious subpoena dispute would start down a slippery slope that could upend separation of powers by involving the courts in a wide array of disagreements between Congress and the Executive Branch.  <paragraph>  "If a committee of Congress could sue the Executive Branch on the basis of a claimed loss of power in a political dispute, then there would be little question that the President or subordinate officials of the Executive Branch would be entitled to bring political disputes with Congress into the judicial forum....Thus, the Judiciary would become the final arbiter of any political dispute between the Branches—or even one between officials of the same Branch—a result that is contrary to our constitutional scheme," the Justice Department lawyers write.  <paragraph>  "A court would have to weigh the relative interests of the political Branches and decide which interest prevails, either by elevating one over the other on a categorical basis or by enmeshing the court in the minutiae of the dispute between the Branches. Such an unmoored weighing of the interests of the political Branches is one the courts are ill-equipped to make," the brief continues.  <paragraph>  The brief also notes repeatedly that thousands of documents related to the gun operation itself have been turned over to Congress. The present dispute pertains to documents that indicate how the Justice Department and others in the federal government responded to Congressional and media inquiries about the matter.  <paragraph>  Unsurprisingly, the Justice Department brief argues that legal precedent favors the courts staying out of such fights. However, the brief acknowledges that just four years ago, U.S. District Court Judge John Bates ruled that the courts did have authority to force Bush White House officials, including White House Counsel Harriet Miers, to respond to subpoenas from a House committee investigating the firing of eight U.S. Attorneys. <paragraph>  The Miers decision "went down the wrong path, and there have now been more congressional suits challenging executive privilege in the past five years (two) than in the previous 220 years combined. This Court should reject the rash call for judicial intervention here, lest the constitutionally-sanctioned and time-honored process of negotiation and accommodation itself becomes a thing of the past," the Justice Department lawyers argue.  <paragraph>  The U.S. Court of Appeals for the D.C. Circuit stayed Bates's ruling pending an appeal, but the case was resolved without a definitive appellate ruling in the early weeks of the Obama administration. <paragraph>  The committee's suit against Holder has been assigned to U.S. District Court Judge Amy Berman Jackson, who was appointed to the bench by Obama last year. Due to the briefing schedule in the case, no ruling is expected until well after the election.
Three journalists subpoenaed by defense in CIA leak case | <paragraph>  Three journalists subpoenaed by the defense in the criminal case against of former Central Intelligence Agency officer John Kiriakou will fight efforts to force them to testify in the case, according to court filings and spokespeople for the news outlets involved.  <paragraph>  The journalists being pressed for testimony are Scott Shane of the New York Times, Julie Tate of the Washington Post and freelancer Matthew Cole, sources told POLITICO.  <paragraph>  The subpoenas seek to force Shane, Tate and Cole to attend depositions and answer defense questions, apparently about classified information related to the CIA's interrogation of alleged terrorists. Prosecutors have indicated they don't plan to call journalists as part of their case.  <paragraph>  Shane and Cole were mentioned in Kiriakou's indictment, though not by name, as recipients of classified information about the identities of CIA personnel involved in the spy agency's "Rendition, Detention and Interrogation" program.  <paragraph>  Tate, a Post researcher who worked on stories about the Guantanamo prisoners and helped develop a Post database of the inmates, was not mentioned in the indictment. However, Kiriakou's lawyers said in a court filing "information developed by Mr. Kiriakou's defense indicates that Researcher 1 [Tate] participated with Journalist A  [Cole] in certain activities alleged in the Indictment."  <paragraph>  A New York Times spokeswoman said the paper will fight the subpoena to Shane, whose reporting on interrogations was specifically cited in Kiriakou's indictment. "We generally oppose subpoenas that seek the testimony of our journalists and we plan to oppose this one," Times spokeswoman Eileen Murphy wrote in an e-mail.  <paragraph>  A spokeswoman for the Post had no immediate comment, but a lawyer for the paper said Tate will seek to block the subpoena issued to her. "We plan to file a motion to quash the subpoena on behalf of Ms. Tate," Williams and Connolly attorney William Doffermyre said in an e-mail.  <paragraph>  Cole's lawyer, Mark Zaid, filed papers in federal court in Alexandria, Va. Thursday asking that the subpoena against his client be thrown out. Zaid said Cole is protected from testifying by the First Amendment and by a reporter's privilege. However, Zaid also said his client, if forced to appear, would invoke his Fifth Amendment rights because he faces a real threat of prosecution for revealing classified information at the deposition. (Cole's motion is posted   <hyperlink> here.)  <paragraph>  It's unclear precisely what information the defense is seeking from the journalists, but it may be seeking to demonstrate that some of the information the government contends it was making efforts to keep secret was in fact being circulated outside the government.  <paragraph>  Depositions are unusual in criminal cases but Kiriakou's defense team argues they are necessary because of special rules that apply to the use of classified national security information in court. The prosecution is   <hyperlink> opposing holding the depositions.  <paragraph>  Kiriakou is facing one charge of disclosing the identity of a covert officer, three counts of violating the Espionage Act by revealing closely-held national defense information, and one count of lying to the CIA's Publications Review Board.  <paragraph>  The press subpoenas were first reported Thursday by Steven Aftergood on the   <hyperlink> Federation of American Scientists's Secrecy News blog. However, Tate was identified in that account only as "Researcher 1," the way she is generically referred to in court papers. Shane's identity is evident from the indictment. Cole's link to the case was   <hyperlink> first reported on this blog in April.  <paragraph>  Defense lawyers   <hyperlink> indicated in July that they wanted to talk with journalists about the case, but there was no talk at that time of compelling witnesses to testify.  <paragraph>  It's unclear why the names of the journalists are being redacted from public court records. While unindicted third parties are not usually named in indictments, they are usually identified publicly in subsequent court filings.
Alito speaks up for Asian Americans | <paragraph>  When the Supreme Court took up the issue of Affirmative Action in higher education Wednesday for the first time in nearly a decade, Justice Samuel Alito seemed to be particularly focused on the program's impact on Asian Americans.  <paragraph>  As lawyer Greg Garre sought to defend the University of Texas's Affirmative Action program, Alito asked about an unusual aspect of the school's racial preference system: it actually seeks out African Americans and Latinos who are privileged socioeconomically and provides a boost in the admissions process.  <paragraph>  "You specifically have the example of the child of successful professionals in Dallas...If you have -you have an applicant whose parents are -- let's say they're — one of them is a partner in your law firm in Texas, another one is a part — is another corporate lawyer. They have income that puts them in the top 1 percent of earners in the country, and they have — parents both have graduate degrees. They deserve a leg-up against, let's say, an Asian or a white applicant whose parents are absolutely average in terms of education and income?" Alito asked.  <paragraph>  "No," Garre insisted. "We want minorities from different backgrounds. We go out of our way to recruit minorities from disadvantaged backgrounds," he said, apparently alluding to another program mandated by state law that admits the top 10 percent of each high school class—effectively admitting a large number of Latinos and African Americans.  <paragraph>  Later, Alito returned again to the issue of whether Asian Americans were being treated fairly in the admissions process.  <paragraph>  "In terms of diversity, how do you justify lumping together all Asian Americans? Do you think — do you have a critical mass of Filipino Americans? Cambodian Americans?" Alito asked.  <paragraph>  "The common form that's used has Asian American, but also, next to that, has a form that says country of origin where that can be spelled out," Garre replied.  <paragraph>  "But do you have a critical mass as to all the subgroups that fall within this enormous group of Asian Americans?" Alito asked.  <paragraph>  "Your Honor, we've looked to whether or not we have a critical mass of underrepresented minorities, which is precisely what the Grutter decision asks us to do," Garre said.  <paragraph>  Alito was arguably the most forceful and argumentative challenger of the Texas program among the justices at Wednesday's arguments. Affirmative action is apparently a subject matter he's had an interest in for some time. At his confirmation hearings in 2006, it emerged that when applying for a job in the Reagan Administration in 1995, Alito listed himself as a member of Concerned Alumni of Princeton, a group whose members expressed concern about rising numbers of women at the university and also challenged some of the school's Affirmative Action practices.  <paragraph>  At his hearings, Alito said he had no recollection of involvement with the group, but may have joined because of its work to support the presence of ROTC military officer training on campus.  <paragraph>  A full transcript of Wednesday's oral arguments is posted   <hyperlink> here.
Did Obama back bans on hate speech? |  <paragraph>  A report Monday on The Daily Caller website argues that when President Barack Obama was a student at Harvard Law School he endorsed the idea of restricting speech in order to protect minorities.  <paragraph>    <hyperlink> The report is a bit short, though, on specifics to back up its conclusion. It hangs largely on a 13-word quote from a panel discussion in which Obama said: "I don’t see a lot of conservatives getting upset if minorities feel silenced." The Caller also cites the recollection of a participant in the panel discussion, Brian Timmons, that all the six panelists except him "promoted the same view." However, Timmons is not quoted offering any specific recollection of what the future president said during the discussion, which included future Supreme Court Justice Stephen Breyer.  <paragraph>  A close reading of the underlying source material, a write-up in the Harvard Law School yearbook, suggests the panel discussed a variety of different subjects ranging from whether an atmosphere of political correctness was unwisely limiting the number of views on campus to whether rules or laws should be imposed to protect minorities from offensive speech. (One of the earliest forays in this battle, a University of Michigan code banning racist or sexist speech, was struck down by a federal court in 1989.)  <paragraph>  Frankly, it wouldn't be surprising if Obama sided with those less supportive of free speech in the campus battles of the 1980s and early 1990s. Many prominent scholars on the left seemed enamored by that position in that era, including  <hyperlink> another future Supreme Court justice, Elena Kagan. The issue split groups like the American Civil Liberties Union, though the pro-free-speech forces ultimately carried the day. <paragraph>  However, the Caller's evidence stops short of putting Obama firmly in the speech-restricting camp. The direct quote reads like a rebuttal to someone else's argument, not a direct endorsement of a particular position or policy. And, of course, it was more than 20 years ago, while he was a student, so not the greatest evidence of his current views.  <paragraph>  Still, it's an interesting data point, especially at a time when the question of offensive speech is in the news as a result of the violence in the Muslim world directed at an anti-Muslim video produced in the U.S.  <paragraph>  Obama didn't offer a vocal defense of free speech principles in his first public comments on the video, though later that same day he said in an interview: "We believe in the First Amendment. It is one of the hallmarks of our Constitution that I’m sworn to uphold.  And so we are always going to uphold the rights for individuals to speak their mind. On the other hand, this film is not representative of who we are and our values, and I think it's important for us to communicate that."  <paragraph>  Obama also presented  <hyperlink> a vigorous defense of free speech principles at the United Nations last month.
White House VIP missing from 'West Wing Week' |    <paragraph>  <video> <paragraph>  Guess who doesn't appear in the latest edition of "West Wing Week," a video series the White House cranks out to promote the work of President Barack Obama and his administration?  <paragraph>  Yep, the seniormost of senior White House officials: President Barack Obama.  <paragraph>  The reason for his startling absence: a lack of official presidential events in a week the president largely spent campaigning and preparing for Wednesday's night's debate with GOP presidential candidate Mitt Romney.  <paragraph>  Due to the Hatch Act, the federally funded "West Wing Week" isn't allowed to feature political events like fundraisers, election rallies and debates (not that the White House would necessarily be promoting a lot of last week's match-up). In most weeks, that restriction isn't a big deal. But, last week, there were apparently no official events on Obama's schedule suitable to be sliced-and-diced by the White House videomakers.  <paragraph>  According to public schedules released by the White House, the only official events Obama took part in last week were four national security briefings. However, as I reported last month, the public schedule is   <hyperlink> far from a complete roster of official or unofficial presidential events.  <paragraph>  With little grist for the mill last week, the White House video team turned its attention to innovative financial and energy-related smartphone apps and a look at the selection of the White House Christmas tree in North Carolina.  <paragraph>  A White House spokesman says it's not the first time Obama has been left out of his own White House's rundown of "everything that's happening at 1600 Pennsylvania Avenue." Even though the video feature regularly goes on the road with him across the country and around the world, there have been "a few" holiday and vacation periods where the president didn't make the final cut, the aide said. <paragraph>  There should be some usable footage of Obama in the coming week, though. He's scheduled to announce the designation of a new national monument to late labor leader Cesar Chavez in California on Monday.
Tax expert: Romney deduction cap doesn't compute |  <paragraph>  At what level would one have to cap itemized tax deductions to pay for GOP presidential candidate Mitt Romney's proposed reduction in income tax rates?  <paragraph>  Romney suggested in an interview this week that a $17,000 limit might do it. In the debate Wednesday night, he said: "Make up a number, $25,000, $50,000. Anybody can have deductions up to that amount. And then that number disappears for high-income people."  <paragraph>  There's no reason, though, that the number has to be so vague. Romney's plan includes a specified number of tax cuts, including lower rates, eliminating the estate tax and abolishing the alternative minimum tax. The Tax Policy Center, a nonpartisan outfit that analyzed Romney's cuts, put the total at $4.8 trillion over 10 years.  <paragraph>  So, I asked one of the center's scholars Thursday what number Romney would have to use as a deduction cap in order to make "revenue neutral" the $4.8 trillion in cuts.  <paragraph>  "It's a negative number," said Roberton Williams, a senior fellow at the Urban Institute, which joins with the Brookings Institution to run the Tax Policy Center.  <paragraph>  "A negative number?" I said.  <paragraph>  "There are not enough itemized deductions to offset his rate cuts," Williams said, adding that eliminating all itemized deductions for all income groups would not cover the tab for the proposed cuts."There's just not enough money there."  <paragraph>  The Romney campaign didn't respond to an e-mail seeking comment for this post, but it has accused the TPC of bias. During the debate, Romney said other analysts have a different take. "There are all these studies out there," he said. He also said his tax proposals would unleash hiring and economic growth that would, in turn, generate added revenue.  <paragraph>  A tax expert with the Heritage Foundation, Bill Beach, said it was unfair to assume that the deductions cap would have to offset the entirety of Romney's rate cuts. He said Romney could pick up additional revenues through capital gains taxes collected after repeal of the estate tax and through repatriation of assets now held abroad. Beach also said the TPC analysis made assumptions that weren't necessarily accurate.  <paragraph>  "We don’t run tax plans unless we have detail on the tax plans," Beach said. "President Obama's tax plan is not that much more detailed."  <paragraph>  Williams said capping deductions would be "a very progressive tax change," because only about 30 percent of taxpayers itemize in the first place and they're almost all upper-middle to high income. "It would fall primarily on the rich," he said. "Lower and middle income people generally don't have enough money to spend to take the $17,000 in deductions that would get them to the cap." <paragraph>  Williams also said such a rule would hit hard in high-cost areas where owners of even modest homes can quickly rack up more than $17,000 in home interest, property and state income tax deductions. "It does target people in different geographic areas differently. New York City is going to get killed," the former Congressional Budget Office staffer said, while adding that wasn't necessarily a reason not to impose such a cap.  <paragraph>  Williams said he thinks the $17,000 figure probably correpsonds to some internal calculation the Romney campaign has made, but not released. "Is there a plan written down somewhere? Because we need to see it....This like saying, 'I have some great dessert for you. Don't pay attention to the broccoli sitting on your plate," the tax analyst said.
Iran unrest could undercut Romney critique |  <paragraph>  Reports of violent clashes in Iran due to the precipitous drop in value of the country's currency could upset GOP presidential candidate Mitt Romney's efforts to paint President Barack Obama's Iran policy as ineffectual.  <paragraph>  Tehran's central bazaar was reported to have been closed Wednesday and riot police were patrolling the streets as public and merchant frustration boiled over, apparently directed at economic woes caused by international sanctions intensified by the Obama Administration. At least one protest against Iranian President Mahmoud Ahmedinejad Wednesday was broken up by tear gas, news agencies reported.  <paragraph>  "Photos showed riot police blocking a street with the charred hulks of a garbage can and a motorcycle that had been set on fire. Smoke was rising from the area in central Tehran near the main bazaar,"  <hyperlink> the Associated Press reported. <paragraph>  "Hundreds of police in anti-riot gear stormed the currency exchange district of Ferdowsi, arresting illegal money changers and ordering licensed exchange bureaux and other shops closed, witnesses told"   <hyperlink> Agence France Presse.  <paragraph>  The Iranian rial's value against the dollar declined by about a third in the past week.  <paragraph>  Romney has argued that he would have moved earlier with tougher sanctions against Tehran.  <paragraph>  The new unrest doesn't indicate that the sanctions are achieving their goal of persuading the Iranians to abandon the nuclear weapons program they insist they're not pursuing. And barring some dramatic change in the coming days, Romney can continue to argue that the administration was slow to embrace tougher sanctions and spent too much time pursuing a rapprochement with Tehran. In addition, scenes of chaos abroad underscore Romney's overall argument that Obama has failed to handle foreign policy capably and that the dangerous world threatens to crash in on the U.S.  <paragraph>  That said, the current clashes and tear gas in the streets are disarming to Romney because they allow Obama to respond to any Iran-related criticism by observing that the sanctions are causing a level of tumult in Iran that could plausibly lead to a change in the nuclear policy.  <paragraph>  Part of the Oct. 16 Obama-Romney debate in New York and all of the Oct. 22 debate in Florida are expected to be devoted to foreign policy issues.
Court extends stop on order blocking indefinite detention law |  <paragraph>  A federal appeals court has extended a temporary stay of a district court judge's order barring the government from using an indefinite detention provision in a defense bill passed by Congress and signed by President Barack Obama late last year.  <paragraph>  A three-judge motions panel of the U.S. Court of Appeals for the 2nd Circuit issued the order Tuesday afternoon, indicating they saw flaws with the scope and rationale for U.S. District Court Judge Katherine Forrest's original order blocking the disputed provision of the National Defense Authorization Act of 2011.  <paragraph>  "We conclude that the public interest weighs in favor of granting the government's motion for a stay," Appeals Court Judges Denny Chin, Raymond Lohier and Christopher Droney wrote in a three-page order that also expedited the appeal.  <paragraph>  The judges continue: “ First, in its memorandum of law in support of its motion, the government clarifies unequivocally that, 'based on their stated activities,' plaintiffs, 'journalists and activists[,] . . . are in no danger whatsoever of ever being captured and detained by the U.S. military.' <paragraph>  Second, on its face, the statute does not affect the existing rights of United States citizens or other individuals arrested in the United States. See NDAA § 1021(e) ('Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect existing law or authorities relating to the detention of United States citizens, lawful resident aliens of the United States, or any other persons who are captured or arrested in the United States.').  <paragraph>  Third, the language of the district court's injunction appears to go beyond NDAA § 1021 itself and to limit the government's authority under the Authorization for Use of Military Force... ”  <paragraph>    <hyperlink> Last month, Lohier alone temporarily blocked Forrest's order, using a so-called administrative stay. <paragraph>  The case will go forward now before what will likely be a different trio of judges, but the stay will likely remain in place pending resolution of the government's appeal. <paragraph>  The import of the law is disputed. Proponents say it simply reinforced authority a federal appeals court in Washington had already accorded to the U.S. government, at least as far as foreigner are concerned. Critics say the measure exposes journalists and human rights activists who meet with alleged terrorists to the prospect of open-ended detention.  <paragraph>  All three judges on the motions panel were appointed to the appeals court by President Barack Obama. <paragraph>  A copy of the panel's order is posted   <hyperlink> here.  <paragraph>  CLARIFICATION (Tuesday, 4:08 P.M): This post has been revised to indicate that Lohier's administrative stay was issued last month.  <paragraph>  CLARIFICATION 2 (Tuesday, 5:01 P.M.): This post has been revised to clarify that all three judges were appointed to the appeals court by Obama.
A pollster under oath | <paragraph>  This post has been updated. See below.  <paragraph>  When a pollster or strategist for a struggling political campaign presents what seems like a sugar-coated view of his candidate's chances, do you ever think: I wish I could give that adviser some truth serum, or maybe put him under oath? <paragraph>  Well, truth serum may be pushing it, but the put-him-under-oath part has actually happened. And when a pollster is required to tell the truth, the whole truth and nothing but the truth, under penalty of perjury, what emerges is quite a bit different than what you hear in the waning days of a presidential campaign.  <paragraph>  In May, the pollster for   <hyperlink> Al Gore's presidential bid in 2000 and John Edwards's in 2004 and 2008, Harrison Hickman, took the stand in the federal criminal case against Edwards over alleged campaign finance violations stemming from payments to support Edwards's mistress.  <paragraph>  (  <hyperlink> See also: PHOTOS: John Edwards on trial)  <paragraph>  Under oath, Hickman admitted that in the final weeks of Edwards's 2008 bid, Hickman cherry-picked public polls to make the candidate seem viable, promoted surveys that Hickman considered unreliable, and sent e-mails to campaign aides, Edwards supporters and reporters which argued that the former senator was still in the hunt —even though Hickman had already told   <hyperlink> Edwards privately that he had no real chance of winning the Democratic nomination.  <paragraph>  "They were pounding on me for positive information. You know, where is some good news we can share with people? We were monitoring all these polls and I was sending the ones that were most favorable because [campaign aides] wanted to share them with reporters," Hickman testified on May 14 at the trial in Greensboro, N.C. "We were not finding very much good news and I was trying to give them what I could find."  <paragraph>  Hickman testified that when circulating the polls, he didn't much care if they were accurate. "I didn't necessarily take any of these as for—as you would say, for the truth of the matter. I took them more as something that could be used as propaganda for the campaign," the veteran pollster said.  <paragraph>  (  <hyperlink> Also on POLITICO: The parallel universe where Mitt Romney leads all polls)  <paragraph>  Edwards's viability from late 2007 through January 2008 was a hotly disputed issue at his trial because federal prosecutors were seeking to prove that nearly $1 million in expenses Edwards backers paid for his mistress in and around that time frame amounted to donations to advance his bid for the presidency. Edwards's defense contended that his inner circle viewed his prospects of winning the presidency as zero or close to it, once Sen. Barack Obama's juggernaut gathered steam, so the payments must have been made out of personal affection for Edwards or for some other reason unrelated to the presidential campaign.  <paragraph>  However, Hickman's testimony also opened a rare window into the way major presidential campaigns try to use polling numbers to spin the press and laid bare the fact that top campaign operatives sometimes propound a version of the truth starkly at odds with what they themselves believe.  <paragraph>  Hickman, called by the former senator's defense, testified that he told Edwards in "early to middle of November 2007," that the campaign wasn't going to succeed.  <paragraph>  "I told him that the odds were overwhelming that we were not going—that he was not going to be the nominee for president. I mean, we talked about a variety of things might change, do differently, and all that, but none of them translated into winning the nomination," the pollster told Edwards attorney Alan Duncan.  <paragraph>  However, under cross-examination by lead prosecutor David Harbach, Hickman acknowledged sending a series of emails in November and December, and even into January, endorsing or promoting polls that made Edwards look good. Asked about what appeared to be   <hyperlink> a New York Times/CBS poll released in mid-November showing an effective "three-way tie" in Iowa with Hillary Clinton at 25 percent, Edwards at 23 percent and Obama at 22 percent, Hickman acknowledged he circulated it but insisted he didn't think it was correct.  <paragraph>  "The business I'm in is a business any fool can get into, and a lot can happen. I'm sure there was a poll like that," the folksy Hickman told jurors when first asked about a poll showing the race tied. "I kept up with every poll that was done, including our own, and there may have been a few that showed them a tie, but... that's not really what my analysis is. Campaigns are about trajectory, and... there could have been a point at which it was a tie in the sense that we were coming down, and Obama was going up, and Clinton was going up."  <paragraph>  Hickman also indicated that senior campaign staffers knew many of the polls were poorly done and of little value. "We didn't take these dog and cat and baby-sitter polls seriously," he said.  <paragraph>  Hickman acknowledged that on January 2, 2008, a day before the Iowa caucuses, he sent out a summary of nine post-Christmas Iowa polls showing Edwards in contention in the Hawkeye State. However, he testified two-thirds of them were from firms he considered "ones we typically would not put a lot of credence in." Hickman put Mason-Dixon, Strategic Vision, Insider Advantage, Zogby and Research 2000 in the "less reputable" group. He also told the court that ARG polls "have a miserable track record."  <paragraph>  (  <hyperlink> See also: POLITICO polling center)  <paragraph>  Hickman said he considered the Des Moines Register polls, CNN and Los Angeles Times polls more accurate. (A full transcript of his testimony is posted   <hyperlink> here.)  <paragraph>  The prosecutor was clearly trying to suggest that Edwards was more viable than Hickman, a longtime friend of the ex-senator, admitted in his initial testimony. Harbach may have even been trying to suggest that Hickman's basic credibility was impugned by the heavy spin he acknowledged offering late in the 2008 primary campaign. However, the line of questioning was baffling to reporters in the courtroom who seemed not at all surprised that a campaign would insist on its viability until moments before the candidate dropped out or lost. <paragraph>  In short, to many journalists, what Hickman admitted doing in late 2007 and 2008 was no more a sign of bad character than an actor spinning a yarn on stage during a play or a lawyer mounting an implausible defense for a clearly guilty client.  <paragraph>  When the defense got to question Hickman again, he was unapologetic about what he termed an effort to "keep up morale" among Edwards backers and aides.  <paragraph>  "They were being inundated with bad news. I didn't have to give them bad news. I was trying to pick out morsels, you know, acorns. Out of a big stack of acorns, I was trying to pick out a few good ones that they could pass along to other people, you know, to keep them working," Hickman testified. "I mean, I wasn't going to say, you know, all hope is lost, you know, take a couple of weeks off. I mean, that was not the object of it. I mean, the object was to keep going as hard as we could. And we all worked as hard as we could. I mean, the working hard and promoting the candidacy are independent, in my mind, to the evaluation of what the likely outcome is."  <paragraph>  Asked if what he did to that end in the 2008 race was at all unusual when compared with other contests, Hickman told Duncan: "No. No. I did -- you know, I did what I was supposed to do…. I did my job the way I've always done my job."  <paragraph>  While the discussion of polling and the legitimate bounds of spin did offer an unusual behind-the-scenes look at a major presidential campaign, it's not at all clear that it had any impact on the outcome of the case against Edwards. Indeed, U.S. District Court Judge Catherine Eagles at one point admonished Hickman and Duncan that the grad-school polling seminar seemed pretty tangential to anything jurors were being asked to consider.  <paragraph>  "I don't think we need quite this much detail about particular polls," the judge said.  <paragraph>  "That's fine, your honor," Duncan replied.  <paragraph>  "I'm sorry," Hickman quickly chimed in.  <paragraph>  After nine days of deliberation, the jury revealed on May 31 that it had   <hyperlink> acquitted Edwards on one felony count and was hopelessly deadlocked on five others. The Justice Department quickly announced that it would not retry the case.  <paragraph>  CORRECTION (Tuesday 11:15 P.M.): The initial version of this post said Hickman is based in North Carolina. His polling firm is based in Chevy Chase, Maryland, just outside Washington D.C.  <paragraph>  UPDATE (Nov. 2, 2:02 P.M.): Some, including the U.S. Senate campaign of Republican Deb Fischer in Nebraska, have seized on this post and Hickman’s testimony in the Edwards trial to suggest that Hickman deliberately skewed his firm’s polls for Edwards and may be doing something similar again in the current election cycle. This year, Hickman is polling for Fischer’s rival, former Sen. Bob Kerrey (D-Neb.).  <paragraph>  After Kerrey’s campaign released a poll Hickman took last month finding Kerrey within striking distance of Fischer,  <hyperlink> Roll Call reported that Fischer campaign spokesman Daniel Keylin said Hickman “admitted under oath that he cherry picked numbers to boost John Edwards’s struggling presidential campaign.” “It’s déjà vu all over again,” Keylin told the newspaper via e-mail.  <paragraph>  However, neither POLITICO’s post nor the transcript of Hickman’s court testimony linked to in the original post indicate that the pollster deliberately skewed any of the polls he did for Edwards or anyone else. At Edwards’s trial, prosecutors did not challenge the accuracy of the surveys Hickman conducted on behalf of the campaign.
Guantanamo prisoner returns to Canada |  <paragraph>  The United States sent to Canada Saturday morning a Guantanamo prisoner who was born in Canada and captured in Afghanistan at the age of 15, announced the Department of Defense.  <paragraph>  Omar Khadr, now 26, was shot in a battle with U.S. Special Forces in Afghanistan in 2002. He was charged with war crimes, including the murder of a Special Forces medic, though some experts expressed doubt about the legality of charging one combatant in a military encounter with killing another barring some sort of unusual circumstances. Khadr's age also complicated the case and drew criticism of it from international human rights groups.  <paragraph>  In 2010, Khadr pled guilty to the charges as part of a plea deal that called for him to serve eight more years in custody, but allowed for his transfer to Canada after a year and included no guarantee of how long he would actually be confined after returning to Canada.  <paragraph>    <hyperlink> The Star report notes that Khadr can apply for parole next summer. However, a senior administration official told POLITICO that Khadr will serve out the sentence imposed by the U.S. military commission at Guantanamo Bay.  <paragraph>  "We do not provide details of security assurances, but we did have extensive discussions with the Canadians about the way ahead for Khadr. He will be incarcerated and serve out the remainder of his sentence," said the U.S. official, who asked not to be named in discussing the diplomatic discussions.  <paragraph>  Khadr was picked up at Guantanamo before dawn Saturday and was being flown to Canada, the news reports said.  <paragraph>  Khadr's transfer and the recent death of another detainee leave the public count of prisoners at Guantanamo at 166.  <paragraph>  UPDATE (Saturday, 9:05 A.M.): This post has been updated with comment from the U.S. official and to note that Khadr is likely to serve at least some additional jail time in Canada.
Obama talked of Libya attack as 'terror' 2 weeks ago |  <paragraph>  Despite a drumbeat from the right and even   <hyperlink> independent fact-checkers that President Barack Obama has been unwilling to label as terrorism the attack on a United States diplomatic mission in Libya, the president indicated just a day after the killing of the American ambassador there that the assault was part of a series of "acts of terror" the U.S. has faced.  <paragraph>  "No acts of terror will ever shake the resolve of this great nation, alter that character, or eclipse the light of the values that we stand for," Obama said   <hyperlink> in a Rose Garden statement on Sept. 12. "Today, we mourn four more Americans who represent the very best of the United States of America.  We will not waver in our commitment to see that justice is done for this terrible act.  And make no mistake, justice will be done."  <paragraph>  Notwithstanding Obama's initial statement, Republicans have faulted him for failing to use the word "terrorism" to describe the attack, even when he was asked directly about it during an interview on Monday.  <paragraph>  "More than two weeks after the attack on our Consulate in Benghazi, President Obama finally called this what it clearly was: an act of terrorism, not a spontaneous protest against a disgusting video," Sens. John McCain (R-Ariz.) and Lindsay Graham (R-S.C.) said in a statement Wednesday. "We recognize that Al-Qaeda involvement in a terrorist attack that killed four Americans in Libya is an inconvenient truth for a President who claims to be destroying Al-Qaeda. But it is not too much to ask why the President and his Administration have taken so long to state what has appeared obvious for a long time about what really happened in Benghazi on September 11, 2012."  <paragraph>  "Why Won't Obama Call It Terrorism?" Republican National Committee Chairman   <hyperlink> Reince Priebus asked in a RealClearPolitics op-ed Thursday. "He [Obama] yet again failed to call it what was: a terrorist attack on the 11th anniversary of 9/11....Now, nearly everyone but the president himself has finally admitted: the attack was the work of terrorists."  <paragraph>  The GOP criticism, while a bit sloppy, isn't without any merit. U.S. Ambassador to the United Nations Susan Rice did seem to make   <hyperlink> an intentional effort 10 days or so ago to argue that the attack stemmed from a spontaneous protest over an anti-Muslim video. Her comments were all the more notable because up until that point, the State Department was refusing to answer questions about discrepancies between Libyan and U.S. statements on the issue.  <paragraph>  It's also fair to note that Obama's initial Rose Garden statement implied a link between the video and the attack, as did almost all of the initial news coverage of the deadly violence at the U.S. Consulate in Benghazi.  <paragraph>  According to   <hyperlink> House Intelligence Committee Chairman Mike Rogers (R-Mich.), there's no indication a protest was under way at the consulate when the compound came under assault from rocket-propelled grenades and other weapons.  <paragraph>  In addition to Ambassador Chris Stevens, three other Americans were killed in the Sept. 11 attack in Benghazi.
Secrecy rule eased in 9/11 case |  <paragraph>  Military prosecutors have agreed to ease secrecy in the case against five alleged Sept. 11 conspirators by ending a presumption that every word the defendants say is classified national security information, defense lawyers said Tuesday.  <paragraph>  "Presumptive classification violates American national security regulations, but it has prevailed for years at Guantanamo Bay,” said James Connell, an attorney for alleged conspirator Ammar al Baluchi. “Hopefully, this change of position will mark the beginning of the end of presumptive classification.”  <paragraph>  Defense attorneys have railed against the presumptive classification procedure, saying it unnecessarily complicated their dealings with their clients and the process for military commissions being carried out at Guantanamo Bay.  <paragraph>  Details of the decision are not publicly available, due to—wait for it—a presumption that all court filings could contain classified information and therefore are kept from the public while they await a classification review.  <paragraph>  However, in a statement, chief prosecutor Army Brig. Gen. Mark Martins seemed to confirm the gist of the defense's announcement.  <paragraph>  "As a general matter across all cases, I will say that the government is committed to considering every reasonable and appropriate measure that could help facilitate the attorney-client relationship for those accused before reformed military commissions who seek such a relationship.  This includes measures that, while safeguarding national security and force protection, may also increase the convenience of handling and use by the defense of discussions clients have with their counsel involving classified or potentially classified information," Martins said.  <paragraph>  It's not immediately clear whether the change of procedure will result in more information reaching the public in military commission legal filings or hearings. However, Connell said in an interview that the new process would make it easier for the defense to request and hold hearings on matters not directly related to the defendants' alleged offenses or role in terrorist activity. Defendants might be able to testify at some hearings without them being closed to the public.  <paragraph>  "It will likely have some impact on the transparency of the process," Connell said.  <paragraph>  Connell said it's unclear whether the decision will apply in cases beyond that arising from the Sept. 11 attacks. It does not apply at the moment to the military commission case related to the bombing of the U.S.S. Cole, he said.
Does Romney have tax shelters? | <paragraph>  A tax shelter, it seems, is in the eye of the beholder.  <paragraph>  In the wake of Republican presidential nominee Mitt Romney's disclosure Friday of his tax 2011 returns, President Barack Obama's campaign charged that the returns show Romney is dodging some of his tax obligations.  <paragraph>  "His release also confirmed what we already knew, which is that he pays a lower rate than most middle-class families because of a set of complex loopholes and tax shelters, and raised more questions than provided answers," Obama campaign spokeswoman Jen Psaki said Saturday.  <paragraph>  Senate Majority Leader Harry Reid (D-Nev.) also seemed to advance the shelter claim, saying, "Once again, we see Mitt Romney is out of touch with middle class families, who don’t have the luxury of accounting wizards and foreign tax shelters."  <paragraph>  Romney's campaign issued a statement Friday in which former IRS commissioner Fred Goldberg reissued his previous opinion that not only were Romney's returns on the up-and-up, but that there was no evidence he'd made any particular effort to lower his tax burden. "There is no indication or suggestion of any tax-motivated or aggressive tax planning activities," Goldberg said.  <paragraph>  I asked the Obama campaign how the returns show Romney has tax shelters. A spokesman sent a few news clippings that use that term, including   <hyperlink> a news story in The Washington Post and   <hyperlink> an editorial in The New York Times.  <paragraph>  Asked if Romney considers any of the investments to be "tax shelters," a spokesman replied: "These funds are all registered with the IRS and report all income to investors and the IRS. The Romney's are taxed on the income from these investments by the blind trust  the same way they would be if the shares were held in the US. No taxes are evaded or reduced."  <paragraph>  Part of the disagreement comes down to issues around the definition of "tax shelters." There are plenty of ways to limit or eliminate tax on certain income. Many, like investing in state or municipal bonds, are so commonplace that it would be hard to call them shelters. Other techniques are still legal but more obscure. And still others are of dubious legality, consisting of transactions that have little or no economic benefit but huge tax benefits. <paragraph>  Most of the buzzwords that make for good TV ads, about investments in the Cayman Islands and Luxembourg, relate to a fairly standard practice of placing overseas U.S.-run investment funds with multiple foreign owners so that foreign investors aren't subject to U.S. taxes. Those foreigners might well dodge taxes, legally or illegally, on that income, but a U.S. citizen is still required to report and pay taxes on worldwide income.  <paragraph>  However,  <hyperlink> The Wall Street Journal reported in January about one tactic Romney (or his blind trust trustee) uses that appears to have the benefit of preventing immediate taxation of some investment income in his unusually large individual retirement account. Some of Romney's investments in that account, which are parked offshore, would be subject to an immediate 35 percent U.S. tax on earnings if kept here.  <paragraph>  However, the Romney campaign countered to the Journal that those investments were not evading U.S. taxes, but preserving the tax-deferred nature of IRAs in which millions of Americans invest. "Governor Romney’s IRA is tax deferred, just like the IRA’s of every other American.  Its investments are in compliance with rules created to keep it tax deferred, just like it was intended to be," a spokesman told the newspaper.
U.S. names 55 Gitmo prisoners cleared to go |  <paragraph>  The U.S. Government has for the first time issued a public list of Guantanamo prisoners cleared for release or transfer, but who remain at the island prison because of difficulties finding a country willing to take them or because of concerns about sending them to their home countries.  <paragraph>  The list (posted   <hyperlink> here) was filed in a series of federal court cases Friday morning and includes the names and serial numbers of 55 detainees. That's almost exactly one-third of the 167 men currently imprisoned at Guantanamo Bay.  <paragraph>  A significant number of the men are believed to be Yemeni.  <hyperlink> President Barack Obama suspended further transfers to Yemen in January 2010, stating that conditions in the country were too "unsettled" to ensure that detainees wouldn't return to or embark on terrorist activities.  <paragraph>  Since 2009, the U.S. Government has kept under wraps the list of detainees approved for release. In a court filing back then (posted   <hyperlink> here), the State Department's envoy for Guantanamo, Ambassador Daniel Fried, cited a need to coordinate diplomatic efforts to resettle the war-on-terror prisoners.  <paragraph>  However, in the new court filings Friday, Justice Department lawyers said that need no longer merited keeping the list secret. They didn't quite concede that the resettlement process has stalled, but that was the implication. Congress has also greatly complicated releases from Guantanamo with a series of legislative measures attached to budget bills that Obama signed into law.  <paragraph>  "In the over two years since the [Guantanamo Bay Review] Task Force completed its status reviews, circumstances have changed such that the decisions by the Task Force approving detainees for transfer no longer warrant protection," the DOJ lawyers wrote in their notice to the court (posted   <hyperlink> here).  <paragraph>  "The efforts of the United States to resettle Guantanamo detainees have largely been successful – they have resulted in 40 detainees being resettled in third countries because of treatment or other concerns in their countries of origin since 2009. In addition, 28 detainees have been repatriated to their countries of origin since 2009. Consequently, the diplomatic and national security harms identified [by Fried in a 2009 court filing] are no longer as acute. In Respondents’ view, there is no longer a need to withhold from the public the status of detainees who have been approved for transfer."  <paragraph>  It's unclear whether the list was ever officially classified, but it was designated as "protected" by the U.S. Government—a designation in Guantanamo cases that effectively keeps certain court records from the public.  <paragraph>  A note on the list indicates that more than 55 detainees may actually be cleared for release, but the status of any additional prisoners ordered released has been placed under seal by the U.S. Court of Appeals for the D.C. Circuit.  <paragraph>  UPDATE: Two civil liberties groups have issued statements reacting to the list's disclosure. <paragraph>  "These men have been cleared for release for at least three years (longer in many cases), and yet they have been held at Guantanamo now for eleven years and counting. It's unconscionable that so few of these cleared men have been released by this administration over the last three years," said Shane Kadidal of the Center for Constitutional Rights.  "The list is clearly incomplete, and based on the total numbers seems to not include the Yemenis cleared for conditional release. Moreover, the government notes in its brief that for a number of cleared men it still needs to seek formal court approval to release their names. That should not be a problem but will take time, and people reading the list should know that some cleared men are not listed only because of this legal technicality."  <paragraph>  “Today’s release is a partial victory for transparency, and it should also be a spur to action,” said Zachary Katznelson of the American Civil Liberties Union. “These men have now spent three years in prison since our military and intelligence agencies all agreed they should be released. Not on the list, of course, is Adnan Latif, who died in his cell earlier this month despite having been repeatedly approved for release from Guantánamo. It is well past time to release and resettle these unfairly imprisoned men.” <paragraph>  CORRECTION (Friday, 9:21 P.M.): This post has been corrected to clarify the reasons Obama gave for suspending transfers to Yemen in 2010.
Appeals court unblocks indefinite detention law |  <paragraph>  A single federal appeals court judge put a temporary hold Monday night on a district court judge's ruling blocking enforcement of indefinite detention provisions in a defense bill passed by Congress and signed into law last year by President Barack Obama.  <paragraph>  U.S. Court of Appeals for the 2nd Circuit Judge Raymond Lohier issued a one-page order staying the district court judge's injunction until a three-judge appeals court panel can take up the issue on September 28.  <paragraph>  Lohier offered no explanation or rationale for the temporary stay. However, the Justice Department has asked the appeals court to block the injunction   <hyperlink> issued by U.S. District Court Judge Katherine Forrest last Wednesday.  <paragraph>  U.S. government officials have argued that the provision in the National Defense Authorization Act simply restates existing law on so-called law-of-war detention, at least the law as interpreted by the D.C. Circuit regarding who can be held for providing "substantial support" to Al Qaeda or allied groups. Critics, including journalists and other activists who filed suit over the provision, say they are in fear of being detained for engaging in their regular work.  <paragraph>  The legal dispute about whether the law can be blocked turns to a great extent on arcane legal points. The Justice Department claims that even though the provision didn't change existing law, blocking causes irreparable harm because blocking any Congressionally-passed statute does so. Forrest said the government's concession meant there was no urgency to keeping the law enforceable.  <paragraph>  Both Forrest and Lohier are Obama appointees.
Feds: Hide SEAL name given to Hollywood |  <paragraph>  Last July,  <hyperlink> a top Pentagon official gave two Hollywood filmmakers the name of a Navy SEAL involved in training the squad of commandos who carried out the raid that killed Osama bin Laden. Now, the Obama administration is fighting to keep that same name from the public.  <paragraph>  In legal papers filed Friday in U.S. District Court in Washington, the Justice Department argued that the government is under no obligation to make public the SEAL's name or the names of Central Intelligence Agency personnel involved simply because officials shared their names, partial names or identities with the makers of a forthcoming movie about the raid, "Zero Dark Thirty."  <paragraph>  "The CIA and DoD did not authorize the filmmakers to make the names they shared with them public, to publicly associate the individuals with the CIA or DoD, or to expose those individuals’ identity in any publicly released film, and there was no reason for the CIA or DoD to have believed that any of this would have happened," the Justice Department brief says. "In fact, [Undersecretary of Defense for Intelligence Mike] Vickers specifically told [filmmaker] Mark Boal, in providing him with the name of someone he could talk to, that 'the only thing we ask is that you not reveal his name in any way as a consultant.'"  <paragraph>  "This limited disclosure of the names to the filmmakers does not make the information 'truly public' under the public domain doctrine," DOJ lawyers argue. "The filmmakers were not authorized to release the names publicly, and the names have not, to our knowledge, been released to the public."  <paragraph>  The brief (posted   <hyperlink> here) was filed in a lawsuit the conservative watchdog group Judicial Watch filed against the Defense Department and CIA seeking disclosure under the Freedom of Information Act of records about government cooperation with Hollywood's effort to bring the bin Laden raid to the big screen.  <paragraph>  The dispute over the names puts journalists in an awkward position. Press advocates generally favor broad disclosure under FOIA and a narrow reading of exemptions the government uses to hold back information requested under that law. However, journalists are often privy to the names of officials providing background briefings and sometimes are given sensitive or classified information on condition it not be disclosed. A strict rule that what's given to any outsider must be given to all could wind up restricting journalists' access to that kind of information.  <paragraph>  Generally, the government can't use exemptions from FOIA to withhold information it has officially disclosed elsewhere. However, for the government to lose its right to withhold the info, the previous disclosure has to be essentially identical (which usually makes the whole fight pointless) and part of some permanent public record.  <paragraph>  In the "Zero Dark Thirty" case, the Justice Department contends that even if the government released the name or names in question, it's irrelevant because the whole "public domain doctrine" doesn't apply in cases where personal privacy is at issue. However, the government did not cite any appellate cases in the D.C. Circuit to support that position. <paragraph>  A Pentagon spokesman told POLITICO  in May that while the filmmakers were offered the opportunity to meet with the SEAL raid planner, the meeting never took place. <paragraph>  "Zero Dark Thirty" is slated for release on Dec. 19.
Activists troubled by White House call to YouTube |  <paragraph>  Prominent civil liberties groups expressed concern on Friday over news that   <hyperlink> the White House urged YouTube to review whether an anti-Muslim video posted on the video sharing site violated the firm's policies. <paragraph>  "There's no indication that the government is questioning the right of these idiots to make that repellent film. On the other hand, it does make us nervous when the government throws its weight behind any requests for censorship," the American Civil Liberties Union's Ben Wizner said in an interview Friday.  <paragraph>  "I am actually kind of distressed by this," said Eva Galperin of the Electronic Frontier Foundation. "Even though there are all these great quotes from inside the White House saying they support free speech....by calling YouTube from the White House, they were sending a message no matter how much they say we don't want them to take it down, when the White House calls and asks you to review it, it sends a message and has a certain chilling effect."  <paragraph>  The White House confirmed the request on Friday, but insisted that YouTube was not asked to take down the video, which paints the Prophet Mohammed as sex-crazed and has led to violent protests at U.S. diplomatic posts across North Africa.  <paragraph>  "The White House asked YouTube to review the video to see if it was in compliance with their terms of use," White House press secretary Jay Carney told POLITICO in an e-mail.  <paragraph>  Both Wizner and Galperin said they'd like to know more details about precisely who contacted YouTube, why, and what was asked of the firm.  <paragraph>  A White House spokesman wouldn't offer much additional detail to POLITICO Friday, but said the request took place on Tuesday and was made by a member of the National Security Council staff.  <paragraph>  Galperin told POLITICO it was pretty clear the White House wanted the video taken down. "They were not calling in support of keeping the video up," she said. "The fact they called at all is highly problematic...I don’t think anyone at the White House genuinely thought YouTube had not revewied this video. It is simply ludicrous to say so."  <paragraph>  Wizner said he was not troubled by figures like President Barack Obama, Secretary of State Hillary Clinton publicly condemning the video, so long as they made clear that it was protected by the First Amendment.  <paragraph>  "It's staggeringly offensive," Wizner said of the video. "There's nothing inappropriate about government officials expressing strongly held views about speech so long as they understand where the line is," he added, noting that the Supreme Court ruled last year, 8-1, in favor of the right of anti-gay religious protesters to demonstrate at military funerals. "It's hard to imagine speech more repellent, more offensive and more painful than that....It's not sandbox out there."  <paragraph>  Obama did not mention free speech rights in his first remarks Wednesday on the controversy and the possibly related attack that killed four U.S. State Department staffers at a diplomatic post in Libya, including the U.S. ambassador to that country. However, during a press interview a short time later, the president did vow to protect First Amendment rights.  <paragraph>  "We believe in the First Amendment.  It is one of the hallmarks of our Constitution that I’m sworn to uphold.  And so we are always going to uphold the rights for individuals to speak their mind.  On the other hand, this film is not representative of who we are and our values, and I think it's important for us to communicate that," Obama told CBS's "60 Minutes" later Wednesday.  <paragraph>  YouTube has blocked access to the video on its site by users in Egypt, Libya and India. Afghanistan's government has reportedly blocked all access to YouTube in order to prevent access to the offending video.  <paragraph>  Spokespeople for YouTube, which is owned by Google, did not immediately respond to a request for comment on the White House's contact with the company. However,  <hyperlink> in a statement Wednesday—a day after the White House request, the firm said the video was "clearly within our guidelines and so will stay on YouTube."  <paragraph>  On Wednesday, the Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff. Gen. Martin Dempsey,  <hyperlink> called a controversial Christian pastor in Florida to ask him not to screen or promote the film. Dempsey, who was seeking to prevent violence against U.S. military personnel abroad, acted "on his own initiative,"  <hyperlink> a Pentagon spokesman said.
Iranian-American group, leader lose libel case against writer | <paragraph>  A federal judge has thrown out a libel suit charging an author with falsely branding a prominent Iranian-American group and its president with being agents of the regime in Tehran.  <paragraph>  U.S. District Judge John Bates issued   <hyperlink> a decision Thursday rejecting the lawsuit brought by the National Iranian-American Council and its president, Trita Parsi, against writer Seid Hassan Daioleslam.  <paragraph>  Bates said NIAC and Parsi had failed to show evidence of actual malice, either that Daioeslam acted with knowledge the allegations he made were false or with reckless disregard about their accuracy.  <paragraph>  NIAC and Parsi have lobbied against efforts to increase U.S. sanctions on Iran and have sometimes pursued other goals that the Iranian government favors, such as protection of Iranian cultural artifacts that are the subject of legal disputes in the U.S. However, NIAC and Parsi have always insisted that they are representing the interests of Iranian-Americans and not that of the government in Tehran. <paragraph>  Bates made clear in his ruling that he wasn't taking a stand on whether the claims the author made about NIAC and Parsi were true.  <paragraph>  "Nothing in this opinion should be construed as a finding that defendant’s articles were true. Defendant did not move for summary judgment on that ground, and it has not been addressed here," Bates wrote. <paragraph>  A spokesman for NIACsaid the group was reviewing the ruling and would not have a comment until Friday.
Lawsuit filed for withheld Fast and Furious documents |  <paragraph>  A conservative watchdog group has filed a federal lawsuit seeking to force disclosure of records that President Barack Obama has ordered withheld from the Congressional investigation into Operation Fast and Furious.  <paragraph>  Judicial Watch filed the suit Wednesday in U.S. District Court in Washington after a Freedom of Information Act request the group submitted in June was denied by the Justice Department. The agency has not acted on an administrative appeal the group filed last month, the complaint says.  <paragraph>  The FOIA suit opens up a second legal front in the effort to obtain the records, which pertain to the federal government's response to Congressional and media inquiries into the Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives operation that allegedly allowed about 2,000 weapons to flow from legal U.S. gun dealers to Mexican drug cartels.  <paragraph>  Last month, the House Government Reform and Oversight Committee   <hyperlink> filed its own lawsuit to obtain the records.  <paragraph>  A Justice Department spokesman had no comment on the new case. However, DOJ officials have noted in the past that the records in dispute don't relate directly to the ATF operation, but rather to how the executive branch responded to some of the fallout from it.  <paragraph>  It's unclear whether the Judicial Watch suit will offer a faster or surer path to disclosure of the records than the House action. The legal footing for the House lawsuit to enforce a subpoena against the executive branch is more uncertain than the routine FOIA case Judicial Watch has filed. However, executive branch agencies' right to withhold "deliberative" records in a FOIA case is fairly broad, while the privilege to resist a Congressional investigation may well be narrower.  <paragraph>  Judicial Watch President Tom Fitton said Thursday that the group's suit could have some benefit even before or without any actual records becoming public.  <paragraph>  "Despite a contempt resolution being passed and the [House] litigation the administration’s refused to disclose exactly what they’re withholding and why," Fitton said in an interview. "We think a FOIA lawsuit is a simple, direct way to get a handle on what's being withheld and why and provides a good vehicle to challenge withholdings, if they are improper, as we suspect they are."
White House: anti-Islam film 'truly abhorrent' |  <paragraph>  A top White House official has blasted as "truly abhorrent" the anti-Islam film that appears to have triggered an outpouring of violence against U.S. diplomatic posts in Egypt and Libya.  <paragraph>  Speaking to an international religious freedom conference in Washington on Wednesday, Deputy National Security Adviser Denis McDonough endorsed efforts to create "a world where the dignity of all people — and all faiths — is respected."  <paragraph>  According to his prepared remarks released by the White House, he then added: "This work takes on added urgency given the truly abhorrent video that has offended so many people — Muslims, and non-Muslims alike — in our country and around the world."  <paragraph>  President Barack Obama's criticism earlier Wednesday of the "Innocence of Muslims" film, or film trailer in question, was a bit more reserved.  <paragraph>  In an interview with CBS's "60 Minutes," Obama said: "This film is not representative of who we are and our values, and I think it's important for us to communicate that."  <paragraph>  And in a statement in the Rose Garden on Wednesday morning, Obama said in an apparent reference to the video: "We reject all efforts to denigrate the religious beliefs of others."  <paragraph>  Secretary of State Hillary Clinton also described the video as "inflammatory."  <paragraph>  GOP presidential nominee Mitt Romney has not, thus far, criticized the video. He has faulted the U.S. Embassy in Cairo and the Obama administration for statements he that said sympathized with those attacking U.S. embassies because of the film. Romney charged Wednesday that the initial statements were "effectively apologizing for the right of free speech."  <paragraph>  In his remarks Wednesday, McDonough also condemned the violence that apparently led to the deaths of U.S. Ambassador Chris Stevens and at least three other Americans in Libya.  <paragraph>  The conference where McDonough spoke was sponsored by the U.S. Conference of Catholic Bishops, an organization that has been sharply at odds with the Obama White House over its efforts to force religiously affiliated hospitals and universities to cover birth control costs for their insured employees.  <paragraph>  Later in his remarks, McDonough — an observant Catholic — referred to Obama as a "brother in Christ" and said "faith has been a guiding force in [Obama's] own life."
Fast and Furious report hearing slips |  <paragraph>  A House hearing about a forthcoming Justice Department report on the Fast and Furious scandal has slipped to next week, the House Oversight and Government Reform Committee announced Monday.  <paragraph>  Oversight Committee Chairman Darrell Issa (R-Calif.) had scheduled the hearing on the yet-to-be-released Office of Inspector General report for Tuesday, Sept. 11. However, the panel delayed the hearing to Wednesday, Sept. 19.  <paragraph>  No reason was given for the delay. However, Inspector Michael Horowitz is expected to testify at the session about his report on the so-called gunwalking tactic and its use by the Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives.  <paragraph>  Issa seems to be trying to time the hearing to the release of the report, which will conclude a year-and-a-half long inquiry into Fast and Furious, an operation that may have allowed as many as 2,000 weapons to fall into the hands of Mexican drug cartels.  <paragraph>  A spokesman for Horowitz declined to comment on the status of the report.  <paragraph>  The House investigation into the operation has prompted President Barack Obama to assert executive privilege to withhold some documents relating to the Justice Department's response to the imbroglio. The oversight panel's lawsuit seeking those documents is pending in U.S. District Court in Washington.
Another death at Guantanamo | <paragraph>  A detainee at the prison for terror suspects at Guantanamo Bay was found dead at the facility on Saturday, the U.S. military said in a statement Monday.  <paragraph>  The statement from the U.S. Southern Command did not say precisely where the prisoner was found, but said he was discovered by guards "conducting routine checks."  <paragraph>  "Guards found the detainee unconscious and unresponsive. The guards immediately performed first aid and summoned medical personnel to the scene. The corpsmen provided emergency medical treatment and quickly transported the detainee to Naval Hospital Guantanamo. After extensive lifesaving measures had been performed, the detainee was pronounced dead by a physician," the SOUTHCOM statement said.  <paragraph>  The statement also offered no information on the prisoner's nationality, age or name. Military officials said the prisoner's identity was "being withheld pending notification of the detainee's government and family."  <paragraph>  In accordance with standard procedures, the Naval Criminal Investigative Service is looking into the cause and circumstances of the prisoner's death, the statement said.  <paragraph>  According to the last public count, there were 168 war-on-terror prisoners at Gitmo. The number of live prisoners now appears to stand at 167.
Obama: U.S. seeks 'due process' in drone strikes | <paragraph>  The U.S. Government seeks to accord "due process" to terror suspects targeted for drone strikes, President Barack Obama said in a recent interview. <paragraph>  "It's very important for the president and the entire culture of our national security team to continually ask tough questions about, are we doing the right thing, are we abiding by rule of law, are we abiding by due process," Obama said in an interview with CNN first aired on Monday. "And then set up structures and institutional checks, so that, you know, you avoid any kind of slippery slope into a place where we're not being true to who we are." <paragraph>  Obama's comments echo   <hyperlink> Attorney General Eric Holder's remarks in a speech in Chicago in March explaining the legal basis the administration asserts for the drone strikes, part of broader programs sometimes referred to as "targeted killing." However, Holder acknowledged in that speech that the "due process" the administration has employed does not involve an independent review by the courts.  <paragraph>  "Due process and judicial process are not one and the same, particularly when it comes to national security," Holder said then. "The Constitution guarantees due process, it does not guarantee judicial process."  <paragraph>  Critics say the kind of due process Holder and Obama are describing is pretty weak stuff: layers of internal administration review, rather than a more formal process involving a court. One oddity of the current legal situation remains that the U.S. government needs some kind of court-approved warrant to intentionally eavesdrop on the telephone or e-mail of a U.S. citizen suspected of involvement with Al Qaeda, like Anwar Al-Awlaki. However, using a drone, a missile, bomb or military raid to intentionally kill that same person requires no approval from the judicial branch. <paragraph>  Another thing absent here despite the administration's welcome steps towards explaining the scope and legal rationale of the drone programs: transparency. While the various systems for authorizing such strikes have been reported on in  <hyperlink> books like Dan Klaidman's "Kill or Capture" and news stories like   <hyperlink> this one in May in the New York Times, virtually nothing about the mechanics of the process is officially on the record. In addition, it's unclear how if at all the secret authorizing system deals with the issue of whether terrorist suspects, particularly Americans, need to be on notice that the government is seeking them before they're killed in a process that offers no opportunity for surrender on the spot. <paragraph>  The administration has also said that it only uses deadly force where capture is "not feasible," something president described as limiting the program to "very remote areas [where] it's difficult to capture them." However, the question of feasibility, sometime referred to as "undue risk" to the U.S. soldiers or operatives who might carry out an operation, seems highly subjective.  <paragraph>  For instance, the operation that targeted Osama bin Laden probably involved "undue risk" to the troops involved, especially when compared with dropping a huge bomb on the house he was living in. The administration seems to be saying it needn't risk an on-the-ground operation when a drone strike will do the trick. (Of course, bombing bin Laden's house would have likely caused civilian casualties, including those of children. ) <paragraph>  Given all those thorny issues, one can understand why Obama, a former professor of constitutional law at the University of Chicago, told CNN's Jessica Yellin that he "absolutely" struggles with the process.  <paragraph>  (By the way, kudos to Yellin for putting the question to Obama in an interview for an election-related CNN documentary. In tweets earlier this week, I credited   <hyperlink> a Cincinnati TV reporter for beating the White House press corps to the punch with the drone-related questions. Turns out Yellin was first and got more out of Obama with sharper questions, though I'm still surprised that it took three years and eight months into Obama's presidency for him to be asked about the subject by a journalist.)  <paragraph>  More on the CNN interview   <hyperlink> here on the 44 blog.
Judge: U.S. can't set limits on Guantanamo lawyers |  <paragraph>  Four years after a Democratic convention replete with criticism of then-President George W. Bush for illegally exceeding his executive powers in places like Guantanamo, President Barack Obama finds his administration the target of a tongue-lashing from a federal judge over its handling of lawyers' access to those same war-on-terror prisoners.  <paragraph>  On Thursday afternoon, U.S. District Court Judge Royce Lamberth handed a resounding victory to Guantanamo inmates and their attorneys, rejecting a bid by the Obama Administration to unilaterally set the rules under which those lawyers operate.  <paragraph>  In his sharply-worded decision, Lamberth was unsparing in his criticism of the government, blasting officials for "an illegitimate exercise of Executive power." <paragraph>  A few months ago, the military asserted that it could determine the visitation and communication rules for lawyers without consulting the courts with regard to detainees whose initial challenges to their detention have already been rejected. Justice Department attorneys defended the Pentagon's stance.  <paragraph>  But lawyers for the inmates noted that prisoners have the right to make new bids for freedom. The terror suspects' attorneys also said there was no reason to abrogate the court-ordered rules that have been in place for years.  <paragraph>  In the 32-page opinion (posted  <hyperlink> here), Lamberth unambiguously sided with the prisoners and their counsel.  <paragraph>  "In the case of Guantanamo detainees, access to the courts means nothing without access to counsel," wrote Lamberth, a Reagan appointee. "And it is undisputed that petitioners here have a continuing right to seek habeas relief. It follows that petitioners have an ongoing right to access the courts and, necessarily, to consult with counsel. Therefore, the Government's attempt to supersede the Court's authority is an illegitimate exercise of Executive power.  <paragraph>  "The Court, whose duty it is to secure an individual's liberty for unauthorized illegal Executive confinement, cannot now tell a prisoner that he must beg leave of the Executive's grace before the Court will involve itself. This very notion offends the separation of powers principles and our constitutional scheme," added Lamberth, who is serving at the moment as the chief judge in the district court in Washington.  <paragraph>  A Justice Department spokesman said government lawyers are reviewing the decision and "have no further comment at this time."  <paragraph>  Lamberth's initial ruling said that no prisoner at Guantanamo had ever been "fully tried or convicted of a crime." That's actually not true. In fact several have pled guilty before military commissions and one, Ahmed Ghailani, was flown to New York and convicted there after a trial. The judge later updated his opinion to say "only a handful have been tried or convicted."  <paragraph>  UPDATE (Friday, 3:45 A.M.): This post has been updated with the change to the judge's opinion.
Appeals court sets arguments on Bradley Manning trial access |  <paragraph>  The military's highest appeals court has announced that it will hear oral arguments next month on a bid to allow the press and public direct access to records relating to the pending court martial of Pvt. Bradley Manning, the Army intelligence analyst accused of leaking hundreds of thousands of diplomatic cables and military reports to WikiLeaks.  <paragraph>  The U.S. Court of Appeals for the Armed Forces will hear the case on October 10, a court clerk said Thursday.  <paragraph>  The appeal is styled as Center for Constitutional Rights v. United States of America and Col. Denise Lind. CCR, a civil liberties group, filed the case on behalf of journalists including WikiLeaks and its founder Julian Assange. On Tuesday, 32 media outlets and organizations, including POLITICO and its parent company,  <hyperlink> filed an amicus brief urging the appeals court to make public the briefs, motions, orders, and docket in the Manning court martial.  <paragraph>  Manning has been in custody since May 2010. He faces 22 charges including aiding the enemy, unauthorized disclosure of national security information and violating orders. He could be sentenced to as much as life in prison. His court martial is currently slated to get underway in January at Ft. Meade, Md.
Ex-Senate aide Doug Hampton gets probation |  <paragraph>  A former aide to ex-Sen. John Ensign (R-Nev.), Doug Hampton, was sentenced Wednesday to one year probation after pleading guilty to a misdemeanor violation of federal ethics statute, court records show.  <paragraph>  Hampton, who left his job as Ensign's administrative assistant after learning of an affair between his wife and the senator, admitted earlier this year that he broke the law when he lobbied a former colleague within a year of leaving the Senate.  <paragraph>  U.S. District Judge Beryl Howell's sentence of one year probation was in line with the defense recommendation. Prosecutors had asked for two years probation.  <paragraph>  In court papers, Hampton's attorney  <hyperlink> painted his client's mistake as part of a messy personal and professional situation that resulted from Ensign's affair. Ensign resigned from the Senate last year after being sharply criticized in a Senate ethics committee report.  <paragraph>  Howell noted that Hampton appeared to be the only person ever sentenced under that legal provision,  <hyperlink> Reuters reported. "You are unique," the wire service quoted Howell as saying.  <paragraph>  Hampton said Wednesday he was "very relieved" about the sentence,  <hyperlink> according to the Associated Press.
Judge to allow Arizona to enforce key part of anti-illegal immigration law | <paragraph>  A federal judge in Arizona has rejected a last-ditch effort by civil liberties and immigrants' rights groups to block enforcement of a hotly-contested provision of Arizona's anti-illegal immigration law, S.B. 1070.  <paragraph>  U.S. District Judge Susan Bolton said in an order Wednesday that she would not stand in the way of a provision in the law requiring police to determination the immigration status of people they encounter and suspect of being in the country illegally.  <paragraph>  The immigrants' rights groups argued that Bolton could block the law because it coud infringe on individuals' constitutional rights, but Bolton noted that in June the Supreme Court indicated that provision could take effect.  <paragraph>  "This Court will not ignore the clear direction in the Arizona opinion that Subsection 2(B) cannot be challenged further on its face before the law takes effect. As the Supreme Court stated, Plaintiffs and the United States may be able to challenge the provision on other preemption and constitutional grounds 'as interpreted and applied after it goes into effect," Bolton wrote in her order (posted   <hyperlink> here.) She did order that a provision on harboring aliens be blocked.  <paragraph>  Bolton issued a separate order Wednesday asking the State of Arizona and the Justice Department to propose a joint order that would put the Supreme Court's June ruling into effect. She said they could propose a joint order within ten days, or the state could propose an order and the feds could lodge any objections to it. Justice Department officials have declined to comment to POLITICO on their preferred timing for allowing that part of the law to take effect. <paragraph>  "Arizona is one big step closer to implementing the core provision of SB 1070. I applaud the federal court for siding with the U.S. Supreme Court in refusing to block the most critical section of this law," Gov. Jan Brewer (R-Ariz.) said in a statement Wednesday afternoon. "After more than two years of legal challenges, it is time that Section 2(B) of SB 1070 take effect. Given today’s ruling, along with the federal court’s suggestion that it intends in the very near future to formally lift the existing injunction, it is clear the day of implementation is fast approaching."  <paragraph>  Opponents, however, said they will keep up the battle against the law.  <paragraph>  "The ACLU of Arizona will act on the court’s message and document racial profiling abuses throughout the state as the first step to guaranteeing equal treatment under the law,” Alessandra Soler, executive director of the American Civil Liberties Union of Arizona, said in a statement. “Latino members of our community should not be subjected to unlawful stops based on their race or perceived immigration status. Once this ‘show me your papers’ provision goes into effect, racial profiling will become rampant statewide, as it has been in Maricopa County, and we intend to ramp up our reporting and litigation efforts to seek justice on behalf of the victims of police abuse.”  <paragraph>  Whenever the key stop-check-and-possibly-hold provision takes effect, there could be concerted protests from Latinos in Arizona and perhaps elsewhere. If that date is before the November election, it could impact Hispanic voter turnout not just in Arizona but across the country.  <paragraph>  UPDATE: This post has been updated with comment from Brewer.
Press outlets protest Manning trial secrecy |  <paragraph>  More than 30 news outlets and media organizations lodged an official protest Tuesday against secrecy in the court-martial of Pvt Bradley Manning, the Army intelligence analyst accusing of leaking hundreds of thousands of military reports and diplomatic cables to WikiLeaks.  <paragraph>  The amicus brief filed with the military's highest court, the Court of Appeals of the Armed Forces, supports a request from the Center for Constitutional Rights to allow public access to motions, briefs, written rulings and the docket in Manning's court-martial.  <paragraph>  While hearings in Manning's case have been in large part public, the motions and briefs the prosecution and defense are arguing about are not available from the court. So, those watching the arguments often have trouble understanding precisely what the lawyers are arguing about.  <paragraph>  "This Court should find that such an arrangement is unconstitutional," lawyers Gregg Leslie and Kristen Rasmussen wrote in the brief, which was joined by POLITICO and parent company Allbritton Communications Co. "The inability to view court documents filed in connection with a particular judicial proceeding burdens the news media’s constitutionally protected right to collect and disseminate the news and severely curtails journalists’ ability to do their jobs effectively."  <paragraph>  The brief (posted   <hyperlink> here) also notes that in a tough economic environment, documents may be essential to journalists' ability to report on the case, particularly one as drawn out as that of Manning, who was arrested in May 2010 and currently has a trial date in next January.  <paragraph>  "Public court records, namely the various legal arguments and requests by parties and their counsel contained in the documents, enable journalists to tell the full story, despite the fact that deadline pressures or shrinking news staffs may drastically limit their ability to attend a lengthy judicial proceeding in its entirety," the media brief says.  <paragraph>  Others signing onto the brief included The Associated Press, Atlantic Media, Dow Jones, Gannett, Hearst, CNN, McClatchy, The New York Times, The New York Daily News, Reuters, the Washington Post, The Tribune Co. and The Washington Post.  <paragraph>  Military prosecutors have urged the court to reject the request for direct access to the court-martial filings. Prosecutors say the public can seek to access the records through the Freedom of Information Act, although that process is almost always untimely and the military has flatly rejected past request for Manning related records. <paragraph>  Manning's defense counsel David Coombs has published some filings on his blog, but the prosecution and the judge have forced him to delete the substance of the prosecution's argument along with the names of virtually all individuals other than Manning mentioned in the documents.  <paragraph>  The brief also points out an odd irony: while legal filings in the miltiary commissions trying alleged Al Qaeda members are — after significant lobbying by the media — published on a military-run website, filings in the highly newsworthy court martial of an American soldier are unavailable to the press and public through official channels.  <paragraph>  Court filings in federal civilian court cases are almost always immediately and directly available to the public and press through an electronic docketing system. The Supreme Court has found a common-law right of access to court records and many courts have found a First Amendment right to such records in most circumstances.  <paragraph>  Military courts have recognized a defendant's constitutional right to a public court-martial since at least the 1980s, the media brief says. And the Army Court of Criminal Appeals found a "qualified" First Amendment right of access to court-martial exhibits in 1998.  <paragraph>  In March, media groups sent Defense Department General Counsel Jeh Johnson a letter seeking access to the Manning court-martial filings. Johnson, who was instrumental in setting up online access to the Guantanamo military commission filings, has not responded to the letter.
